

BRADLEY D TILDEN - ISSAQUAH, WA - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



WA



ISSAQUAH



Hardware



Wholesale - Brads



                            BRADLEY D TILDEN
                                    



 





















B 


BRADLEY D TILDEN
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



4733 194TH AVE SE ISSAQUAH, WA 98027
Get Directions








Business Info



 Founded 2011
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue $120,000.00
 Employee Count 2
 Industries Wholesale - Brads
 Contacts 






Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Bradley D Tilden was founded in 2011, and is located at 4733 194th Ave Se in Issaquah. It employs 2 employees and is generating approximately $120,000.00 in annual revenue. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







B

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com







Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.


















Bradley D. Tilden, Alaska Air Group, Inc.: PwC

























































PwC | United States




 














 








								Share
								
Linkedin
twitter
FB
GooglePlus











Cyprus
South Africa
Estonia
Finland
Hungary
Gibraltar
Trinidad and Tobago
Macedonia
Nigeria
Cayman Islands
Caribbean
Pakistan
Equatorial Guinea
Mongolia
Portugal
Channel Islands
Sri Lanka
Armenia
Maldives
Ecuador
Croatia
India
Moldova
Vietnam
South Korea
Czech Republic
Netherlands
Kazakhstan
Philippines
Indonesia
Greece
Turkey
Norway
PRTM Japan
Hong Kong
United KingdomUK
Cambodia
British Virgin Islands
Netherlands Antilles
Brunei
Zimbabwe
Costa Rica
Iceland
United StatesUSUSAU.S.
Middle East RegionMiddle EastBahrainEgyptIraqJordanKuwaitLebanonLibyaOmanQatarSaudi ArabiaUnited Arab EmiratesWest BankGaza
Botswana
Denmark
Panama
Singapore
Tanzania
Spain
Interaméricas
Romania
Kenya
Laos
Malta
Bulgaria
Congo (Brazzaville)
Global
Israel
Austria
Swaziland
Bolivia
Colombia
Georgia
Italy (PwC)
Ghana
Thailand
Zambia
Albania
Switzerland
Rwanda
Jamaica
Malaysia
Sweden
Madagascar
New Caledonia
Papua New Guinea
Belgium
Ukraine
Latvia
Venezuela 
Bermuda
Cameroon
Honduras
Argentina
Brasil
Mozambique
Cape Verde
New Zealand
Azerbaijan
Guinea
Senegal
Uruguay
Barbados
Poland
France
Uganda
Russia
Malawi
China
Paraguay
Namibia
Bahamas
Nicaragua
Kosovo
Dominican Republic
Peru
PwC Google
Slovakia
Uzbekistan
Ireland (Republic of)
El Salvador
Angola
Central and Eastern Europe
Mexico
Gabon
Japan
Taiwan
Chad
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Canada
Myanmar
Congo (Dem. Rep.)
Guatemala
Serbia
Luxembourg
Mauritius
Chile
Isle of Man
Australia
Belarus
Germany


No match found






  


















Bradley D. Tilden - Executive Bio, Compensation History, and Contacts - Equilar Atlas










 

















Log in | Sign up








x

 






As Featured In



















Bradley D. Tilden
Chairman of the Board, President and Chief Executive Officer at Alaska Air Group, Inc.


View Full Profile
Are you Bradley D. Tilden? Claim your profile


 


Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view Bradley D. Tilden's full profile. 
With Equilar Atlas, you can:



IDENTIFY corporate executives in Bradley D. Tilden's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in Bradley D. Tilden's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with Bradley D. Tilden through your network of contacts.
												








Bradley D. Tilden's Executive Work History


Current


Chairman of the Board, President and Chief Executive Officer, 
Alaska Air Group, Inc.


Board Member, 
Nordstrom, Inc.


Past
To view Bradley D. Tilden's complete executive work history, sign up now
Education


														 Bachelor's, 
															Pacific Lutheran University


														 M.B.A., 
															University of Washington


Age
56

 
 


Bradley D. Tilden's Biography



Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of Alaska Air Group, Inc., an airline holding company, since January 2014. In May 2012, Mr. Tilden was named President and Chief Executive Officer of Alaska Air Group. He served as Executive Vice President of Finance and Planning from 2002 to 2008 and as Chief Financial Officer from 2000 to 2008 for Alaska Air Group, and prior to 2000, was Vice President of Finance at Alaska Air Group. Before joining Alaska Airlines, Mr. Tilden worked for the accounting firm PricewaterhouseCoopers. He serves on the board of Alaska Air Group.
 
Mr. Tilden brings to the Board executive, operational, strategic planning and  ...
(Read More)

			Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of Alaska Air Group, Inc., an airline holding company, since January 2014. In May 2012, Mr. Tilden was named President and Chief Executive Officer of Alaska Air Group. He served as Executive Vice President of Finance and Planning from 2002 to 2008 and as Chief Financial Officer from 2000 to 2008 for Alaska Air Group, and prior to 2000, was Vice President of Finance at Alaska Air Group. Before joining Alaska Airlines, Mr. Tilden worked for the accounting firm PricewaterhouseCoopers. He serves on the board of Alaska Air Group.
 
Mr. Tilden brings to the Board executive, operational, strategic planning and financial experience, as well as insights with respect to customer rewards programs in the consumer services industry. Mr. Tilden's service on a public company board provides him with experience with corporate governance matters and key skills in working with directors, understanding board processes and functions, assessing risk and overseeing management.
		
Source: Nordstrom, Inc. on 03/24/2017
		
	

 






Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view Bradley D. Tilden's full profile. 



												By accessing Equilar Atlas, you can view bios, network, salary and wealth events
												of industry-leading executives like Bradley D. Tilden. More specifically, you'll be able to:
												

IDENTIFY corporate executives in Bradley D. Tilden's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in Bradley D. Tilden's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with Bradley D. Tilden through your network of conections.
												




View Full Profile


 








Search for over 360,000 executive profiles.





/bio



													Example: Bradley D. Tilden


















Bradley D. Tilden's Connections (160)





Sign up now to view Bradley D. Tilden's 160 connections »









John F. Kelly
Former Board Member, Avista Corporation









Michael G. Koppel
Former Consultant, Nordstrom, Inc.









Brad D. Smith
Chairman of the Board of Directors, President and Chief Executive Officer, Intuit Inc.









Brian K. Turner
Board Member, Nordstrom, Inc.









Patricia M. Bedient
Board Member, Suncor Energy Inc.









Christine F. Deputy
Executive Vice President, Human Resources, Nordstrom, Inc.









Mark R. Hamilton
Former Board Member, INTERNATIONAL TOWER HILL MINES









Richard P. Fox
Board Member, Acxiom









Enrique Hernandez
Non-Executive Chairman of the Board, McDonald's Corporation









Andrew R. Harrison
Executive Vice President and Chief Commercial Officer, Alaska Airlines, Inc., Alaska Air Group, Inc.








Popular Profiles






														Sign up now to view more executive profiles »
														









Thomas J. Lynch
Executive Chairman, TE Connectivity Ltd.









John J. Kita
EVP and CFO, A. O. Smith









Elon R. Musk
CEO and Chairman, Tesla









Daniel A. DeMatteo
Executive Chairman, GameStop Corp.









David J. O'Connor
President and CEO, The Madison Square Garden Company












×

Claim Your Profile Coming Soon
Interested in updating your biography and work history?
We're working on making it happen.
We'll email you when this feature is available.
Please enter valid email address.

Done


Thank you for your interest.
Ok






			Browse executive profiles:
			
				 A
			
				 B
			
				 C
			
				 D
			
				 E
			
				 F
			
				 G
			
				 H
			
				 I
			
				 J
			
				 K
			
				 L
			
				 M
			
				 N
			
				 O
			
				 P
			
				 Q
			
				 R
			
				 S
			
				 T
			
				 U
			
				 V
			
				 W
			
				 X
			
				 Y
			
				 Z



Equilar Homepage
Equilar Atlas
Equilar Insight
Equilar BoardEdge
Equilar Engage
Research Services
Knowledge Network
About Us
Login

� 2017 Equilar All Rights Reserved. Privacy Policy
1100 Marshall Street, Redwood City, CA 94063 | Phone (650) 241-6600 | Fax (650) 701-0993
















Brad Tilden - Wikipedia





















 






Brad Tilden

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Brad Tilden


Born
Issaquah, Washington, U.S.


Nationality
American


Occupation
President of Alaska Airlines


Years active
2008–present


Bradley D. Tilden is president and chief executive officer of Alaska Airlines and Alaska Air Group which is the parent company of Alaska Airlines and its sister carrier Horizon Air. On May 15, 2012 Tilden replaced Bill Ayer as the company's chief executive officer.[1][2] On July 14, 2012 former Alaska Air Group's CEO Bill Ayer announced that he would be stepping down and named Tilden as his replacement. Prior to becoming the company's President in 2008 Tilden served as Alaska Air Group's chief financial officer and executive vice president of finance, leading the Finance, Information Technology, Planning, Revenue Management and Corporate Real Estate organizations.[3] In 2015, Tilden was named Executive of the Year by the Puget Sound Business Journal.[4]
Background[edit]
Tilden is an Eagle Scout.[5] As a young student Tilden's love of airplanes began on a field trip to the airport where he saw his first Boeing 727.[6] After graduating from Highline High School in 1979[7] Tilden enrolled at Pacific Lutheran University. Originally planning on becoming a teacher Tilden eventually became interested in business and would earn a degree in business administration and accounting.[6] Following graduation Tilden worked for eight years at the accounting firm Price Waterhouse at its offices in Seattle, Washington and Melbourne, Australia.[8] In 1991 Tilden interviewed and was hired by Alaska Airlines. In 1997 he would earn his Masters in Business Administration from the University of Washington.

References[edit]



^ Gates, Dominic. "Brad Tilden new Alaska Air CEO as Bill Ayer announces retirement". The Seattle Times. Retrieved 21 February 2012. 
^ "Alaska Air Group Corporate Governance - Management". Alaska Air Group, Inc. Retrieved 21 February 2012. 
^ "Alaska Airlines Executive Leadership". Alaska Air Group, Inc. Retrieved 21 February 2012. 
^ http://www.bizjournals.com/seattle/blog/2015/12/the-2015-psbj-executive-of-the-year-has-led-his.html
^ http://blog.scoutingmagazine.org/2015/09/04/check-months-cover-alaska-airlines-magazine/#more-44996
^ a b "Chance class project inspires Tilden's airline career". Scene. PLU. Retrieved 21 February 2012. 
^ "Highline Schools Foundation gives out gold stars to five outstanding individuals". Highline Times. Retrieved 22 February 2012. 
^ Clements, Barbara. "Tilden Flies High as Alaska Airlines' new president". PLU. Retrieved 21 February 2012. 









v
t
e


Alaska Air Group



Certificated airlines



Alaska Airlines
Horizon Air
Virgin America





Heritage companies



Air Oregon
Alaska Coastal Airlines
Barnhill & McGee Airways
Jet America Airlines
McGee Airways
Star Air Service
Transwestern Airlines





Destinations



Alaska Airlines destinations
Horizon Air destinations
Virgin America destinations





Marketing brands



Alaska Horizon
Alaska SkyWest





Major incidents



Flight 261
Flight 779
Flight 1866





People



Bill Ayer
Bill Boyer Jr.
Bruce R. Kennedy
Linious "Mac" McGee
Brad Tilden





Namesakes



Alaska Airlines Arena
Alaska Airlines Center
Horizon Air Summer Series








List of airline holding companies










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Brad_Tilden&oldid=727000040"					
Categories: Alaska Air Group peopleAmerican airline chief executivesLiving peoplePeople from Issaquah, WashingtonAmerican chief financial officersEagle ScoutsPacific Lutheran University alumniUniversity of Washington alumniHidden categories: Articles with hCardsYear of birth missing (living people) 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 25 June 2016, at 23:07.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 








Bradley D. Tilden: Executive Profile & Biography - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 23, 2017 9:50 PM ET
Airlines

Company Overview of Alaska Air Group, Inc.



SnapshotPeople 




OverviewBoard MembersCommittees



Executive Profile
Bradley D. Tilden  Chairman, CEO & President, Alaska Air Group, Inc.AgeTotal Calculated CompensationThis person is connected to 6 Board Members in 6 different organizations across 6 different industries.See Board Relationships56$4,246,312As of Fiscal Year 2016
Background

		Mr. Bradley D. Tilden, also known as Brad, has been the Chief Executive Officer and President at Alaska Air Group, Inc. since May 15, 2012. Mr. Tilden has been the Chief Executive Officer of Alaska Airlines, Inc. since May 15, 2012. Mr. Tilden served as the Chief Executive Officer of Horizon Air Industries, Inc. from May 15, 2012 to May 17, 2016. He served as President of Alaska Airlines, Inc. since December 2008. He is a 21-year veteran at Air Group. He served as the ... Chief Financial Officer of Alaska Air Group Inc., Air Group and Alaska Airlines Inc. from February 2000 to December 2008 and also served as Alaska Air Group's Executive Vice President of Finance and Planning from January 2002 to December 2008. He served as Executive Vice President of planning at Alaska Airlines Inc. from April 27, 2007 to December 2008 and also served as its Executive Vice President of Finance until December 2008. He joined Alaska Airlines from Price Waterhouse in 1991 and served as Controller of Alaska Airlines Inc. and Alaska Air Group Inc. since 1994. Mr. Tilden has been the Chairman of Alaska Air Group, Inc., Horizon Air Industries, Inc. and Alaska Airlines, inc., since January 2014. He has been a Director at Virgin America Inc. since December 14, 2016. He has been an Independent Director of Flow International Corporation since May 2010. He has been a Director of Alaska Air Group, Inc., Horizon Air Industries, Inc. and Alaska Airlines Inc. since December 2, 2010. He has been an Independent Director of Nordstrom, Inc. since February 2016. He serves as a Director of Pacific Lutheran University and the Chief Seattle Council of the Boy Scouts of America. He is a Private Pilot. Mr. Tilden holds Bachelor's Degree in Business Administration from Pacific Lutheran University and an Executive Master's Degree in Business Administration from the University of Washington.Read Full Background




Corporate Headquarters
19300 International BoulevardSeattle, Washington 98188United StatesPhone: 206-392-5040Fax: --
Board Members Memberships
ChairmanHorizon Air Industries, Inc.2010-PresentChairman, CEO & PresidentAlaska Air Group, Inc.2010-PresentIndependent DirectorFlow International Corporation2010-PresentChairman, Chief Executive Officer and Chief Executive Officer of Alaska Air Group, IncAlaska Airlines, Inc.2016-PresentDirectorNordstrom, Inc.2016-PresentDirectorVirgin America Inc.
Education
MBA University of WashingtonBBA Pacific Lutheran University Inc
Other Affiliations
Nordstrom, Inc.Flow International CorporationAlaska Airlines, Inc.University of WashingtonHorizon Air Industries, Inc.Pacific Lutheran University IncVirgin America Inc.


Annual Compensation
Salary$487,600Total Annual Compensation$487,600
Stocks Options
Restricted Stock Awards$1,817,951All Other Compensation$206,027Exercised Options$24,920Exercised Options Value$1,832,357Exercisable Options$132,484Exercisable Options Value$9,135,054Unexercisable Options$45,776Unexercisable Options Value$1,743,656Total Value of Options$12,711,066Total Number of Options$203,180
Total Compensation
Total Annual Cash Compensation$1,655,961Total Short Term Compensation$487,600Other Long Term Compensation$2,023,978Total Calculated Compensation$4,246,312




Request Profile Update
















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



COMPETITOR COMPENSATIONNamePosition/CompanyCompensationRobin  Hayes Chief Executive Officer, President and DirectorJetBlue Airways Corporation$611.1KEnrique  Cueto Plaza Chief Executive OfficerLATAM Airlines Group S.A.--Robert L. Fornaro Chief Executive Officer, President and DirectorSpirit Airlines, Inc.$578.2KGregg  Saretsky Chief Executive Officer, President & Non-Independent DirectorWestJet Airlines Ltd.$766.0KPedro  Heilbron Chief Executive Officer and DirectorCopa Holdings, S.A.--Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2016.










Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Alaska Air Group, Inc., please visit .  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close


























Alaska Air Group (ALK) Bradley D. Tilden on Q2 2015 Results - Earnings Call Transcript | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Alaska Air Group (ALK) Bradley D. Tilden on Q2 2015 Results - Earnings Call TranscriptJul.23.15 | About: Alaska Air (ALK) Alaska Air Group, Inc. (NYSE:ALK)
Q2 2015 Earnings Call
July 23, 2015 11:30 am ET
Executives
Lavanya Sareen - Managing Director-Investor Relations
Bradley D. Tilden - Chief Executive Officer and President
Benito Minicucci - Chief Operating Officer and Executive Vice President, Operations, Alaska Airlines, Inc.
Andrew R. Harrison - Executive Vice President and Chief Revenue Officer
Brandon S. Pedersen - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President, Finance
Mark G. Eliasen - Treasurer & Vice President-Finance
Joseph A. Sprague - Vice President-Marketing, Alaska Airlines, Inc.
Analysts
Savanthi N. Syth - Raymond James & Associates, Inc.
Julie A. Yates-Stewart - Credit Suisse Securities (NYSE:USA) LLC (Broker)
Hunter K. Keay - Wolfe Research LLC
Joseph W. DeNardi - Stifel, Nicolaus & Co., Inc.
Helane R. Becker - Cowen & Co. LLC
Jamie N. Baker - JPMorgan Securities LLC
Duane Pfennigwerth - Evercore ISI
Darryl Genovesi - UBS Securities LLC
David Fintzen - Barclays Capital, Inc.
Michael J. Linenberg - Deutsche Bank Securities, Inc.
Dan J. McKenzie - The Buckingham Research Group, Inc.
Rajeev Lalwani - Morgan Stanley & Co. LLC
Operator
Good morning. My name is Stephanie, and I will be your conference operator today. At this time, I would like to welcome everyone to the Alaska Air Group's Second Quarter 2015 Earnings Conference Call. Today's call is being recorded and will be accessible for future playback at www.alaskaair.com. All lines have been placed on mute to prevent any background noise. After the speakers' remarks, there will be a question-and-answer session for analysts. Thank you.
I would now like to turn the call over to Alaska Air Group's Managing Director of Investor Relations, Lavanya Sareen.
Lavanya Sareen - Managing Director-Investor Relations
Thanks, Stephanie. Good morning, everyone, and thank you for joining us for Alaska Air Group's second quarter 2015 earnings call.
Our CEO, Brad Tilden; our CFO, Brandon Pedersen; Chief Commercial Officer, Andrew Harrison; and Chief Operating Officer, Ben Minicucci, will provide highlights from the second quarter and our outlook for the remainder of the year. Several members of our senior management team are also on hand to help answer your questions.
Our comments today will include forward-looking statements regarding our future expectations, which may differ significantly from actual results. Information on risk factors that could affect our business can be found in our SEC filings. We will refer to certain non-GAAP financial measures, such as adjusted earnings and unit costs excluding fuel. We have provided a reconciliation between the most directly comparable GAAP and non-GAAP measures in our earnings release.
This morning, Alaska Air Group reported a record quarterly adjusted profit of $230 million or $1.76 per diluted share. This result compares to the First Call consensus of $1.73 per share and exceeds last year's adjusted net income of $157 million or $1.13 per diluted share. Additional information about cost expectations, capacity plans, fuel hedging, capital expenditures, and other items can be found in our investor update included in our Form 8-K filed this morning, and is available on our website at alaskaair.com,
And now, I'll turn the call over to Brad.
Bradley D. Tilden - Chief Executive Officer and President
Thanks, Lavanya. And good morning, everyone. As Lavanya mentioned, we reported a net profit of $230 million for the second quarter, which is 46% higher than 12 months ago. This is our 25th consecutive quarter of profitability and is the highest quarterly profit in our history. The 46% growth in our net profit coupled with the repurchase of 9.5 million shares over the last 12 months drove our earnings per share up by 56% to $1.76 per share.
As we pause to take a look at how we're doing midyear and two-and-a-half years into the biggest competitive incursion we've seen in a while, I'm happy to share that we are thriving. Our operation is firing on all cylinders, our leaders are focused on execution, and we are generating returns that far exceed our cost of capital. But before I talk about the returns, I want to spend a few minutes on the underlying drivers of our results.

I'll start with safety. Our number one priority is to operate safely. And we think that doing so benefits our overall operation because to be safe, we have to all understand our jobs and we have to have the tools and training to do them well. And this focus on doing things right has benefits that extend throughout our airline. Our commitment to operating safely was recently validated by our maintenance team, earning the FAA's AMT Diamond Award for maintenance training and excellence. This is the 14th consecutive Diamond Award for Alaska Airlines. Horizon Air has also won the award 14 times.
Turning to our operation, we continued to operate well despite some headwinds. As you know, we're growing significantly to strengthen and fortify our franchise in Seattle. And we crossed the 1,000-flight-per-day threshold on July 2. The increased flying coupled with runway closures in Seattle, LA, and Juneau created a challenging operational environment this spring and summer. But our people moved quickly.
Our system ops team adjusted block and ground times and implemented a dual-taxiway in our Seattle hub, which allows us to taxi two planes side by side in opposite directions. And our operations team executed the plan really well. 88.2% of our flights arrived on time, and we cancelled only one-half of 1% of our flights. We expect that both of these statistics will lead the seven largest domestic airlines, many of whom are running their own great operations. Our people are delivering on our promise of a safe, reliable, and on-time operation. And Ben, Dave and I and the rest of the leadership team could not be more proud of them.
On the customer service front, our internal customer satisfaction score for the quarter tied our score from the first quarter of 2015, which was the highest score we've seen since we began tracking this data in 2007. As you know, we also won our eighth consecutive J.D. Power Award for customer service during the quarter.
We're pleased that the enhancements to our product and service are resonating with customers, but we have more work to do. The on-board experience is an area where we've made a lot of changes and we have more plan. For example, we've introduced a new Inflight Entertainment system, we've improved the meals in both cabins, and we've given our flight attendants mobile devices, which facilitate greater personalization in their interaction with customers. In May, we introduced preferred seating, which gives passengers additional legroom, early boarding, and a free drink. We're very interested in seeing how this product is received, as it could lead to more opportunity down the road.
With respect to our schedule, earlier this month, we launched new service from Seattle to both Milwaukee and Oklahoma City, and from Portland to St. Louis, with all of these being served with a new aircraft type, the Embraer E175. The early returns on these markets are very good. We're looking forward to new service this fall to JFK, Raleigh, Charleston, Nashville, and Costa Rica.
And finally, recognizing that the customer preference and financial success that we have today is due in part to our superior service, we're doubling down on service through a new series of workshops for our customer-facing employees. Ben is going to tell you a bit more about these in a moment. We expect that each of these changes is going to improve the experience for our customers and help us increase the preference they have for Alaska.
Moving to financials, I felt that we had good performance this quarter. Our pre-tax margin of 25.7% is 740 basis points higher than last year. This is our best quarterly performance ever, and we expect our margin performance to be near the top of the industry and to exceed the S&P 500 companies on average. Of course, a lot of the improvement is due to lower fuel prices, but we also had relatively strong revenue performance and strong cost performance. The fact that we were able to take the majority of the lower fuel prices to the bottom line is a testament to the focus and diligence of our leadership team.

Our ROIC of 22% over the last 12 months far exceeds our cost of capital and speaks to a business that has created tremendous value for its owners. And to give you a sense for how things are moving, our pre-tax income for the first six months of 2015 was $610 million, which is about equal to what we earned for all of 2013. More broadly, we expect this to be a record quarter for the industry and an indication that the industry is healthy and focused on earning returns that exceeds its cost of capital.
While fuel is low and economy is generally strong, we believe that this is still a cyclical business. Being flexible is important for producing strong results throughout the cycle. Alaska is the only U.S. airline that has net interest income and this, combined with the 80 aircraft that we own free and clear, gives us great flexibility should we see fluctuations in fuel prices or a downturn in the economy. This increased flexibility has allowed us to be profitable through the worst recession since The Great Depression and to perform strongly in the midst of unprecedented competition.
But most importantly, our people have proven themselves to be resourceful and resilient. We have said for some time now that competition should make us better. But as I see these results, talk with our customers, and see our employees out in the operation, I'm convinced that we are a better and stronger company today than we were three years ago, and our leadership team is heads down and focused on the future. Focused on executing our plan to keep Alaska strong and prosperous over the long run and creating value for our employees, our customers, our communities, and very importantly our shareholders.
The program for customer-facing employees, which I mentioned earlier, is one step in that direction and I want to turn the call over now to Ben to provide some detail on this.
Benito Minicucci - Chief Operating Officer and Executive Vice President, Operations, Alaska Airlines, Inc.
Thanks, Brad. And good morning, everyone. At Alaska, we know that a low-cost structure is fundamental to our long-term financial success. And we also believe that our success has been fueled by our rich history and culture of customer service that has been a cornerstone of our sustainability. This year, despite winning an eighth J.D. Power Award, we challenged ourselves to up our game in the area of customer service.
We created what we call the Beyond Service workshop that all 8,000 customer-facing employees and their leadership teams will attend throughout 2015. This experience conducted over one-and-a-half days is being held in a really unique venue in South Seattle that's designed to celebrate our rich history and roots of customer service DNA, educate our employees on the competitive landscape, share the essence of our brand with them, and present our service framework built on safety, caring, delivery, and presentation.
This framework is designed to engage, empower and align everyone at Air Group in an effort to create a consistent approach to service that results in exceptional customer experience. The workshop is very intimate, hands-on, and two-way dialogue facilitated primarily by frontline employees like flight attendants, customer service agents, and reservation agents. They review real-life examples on how to deliver exemplary service in various and sometimes challenging scenarios. The big takeaway learnings are empowerment, knowing when to make exceptions to policies, and enhancing the trust between management and frontline employees. This investment in our people will help us create additional separation from our competitors and confirm our place on the list of best-in-class service providers.
We believe that Beyond Service, when combined with our operational excellence, creates a compelling proposition for our customers and strengthens our brand preference.

And now, over to Andrew.
Andrew R. Harrison - Executive Vice President and Chief Revenue Officer
Thanks, Ben. And good morning, everybody. Our second quarter passenger revenue increased $57 million or 4.9% on 10.7% capacity growth. Our second quarter PRASM was down 5.3% as a result of the 13% increase in capacity in our markets. But notwithstanding this, our PRASM gap to the industry narrowed by 300 basis points to 2.1%. In fact, our June PRASM was 2.1% better than the industry despite our capacity growth of 7.2%.
As you know, we are growing. And as we grow, we are focused on diversifying our revenue streams and growing our customer base. I want to take a few moments to provide you with some details under each of these areas. I'll start off with diversifying revenue streams. First, we launched 18 new markets since the beginning of Q2 of 2014. Almost 70% of these markets are profitable within their first year of operation. And additionally, half of these markets would be profitable if fuel were $3 a gallon. We expect all new markets to continue to improve as they mature.
Secondly, we'll be relaunching 18 new markets in the second half of 2015. All of this growth is undergirded by tremendous customer loyalty, continued cost discipline, and matching the right aircraft to the right market. For example, we are very pleased to introduce new Embraer 175s to the fleet earlier this month. This will be a great airplane for us and allow us to serve long thin markets profitably. By late 2016, we'll have over 15 E175s in the network, all of which will be operated by our CPA partner, SkyWest.
Third, we introduced a new revenue stream through the preferred seating this quarter and we are very encouraged to see the highest uptake was on actual shorter stage lengths, which have the highest passenger volumes. We will continue to make revenue-enhancing adjustments to this program over time as we learn more about customer behavior and preference.
And lastly, we've been very pleased with our first class revenue performance. Upgrade sales at the gate increased 17%, and our P class or discounted first class fares helped boost our paid first class load factor by 1.6 points to 35%. In Q2, our paid first class PRASM was down only 0.5%, significantly better than our system PRASM performance.
Moving to the second theme, growing our customer base. We continue to focus on customers with our industry-leading on-time performance, improvements to our on-board product, and ever-expanding network. Our customers are rewarding our efforts with greater loyalty. Our loyalty program generated $175 million in cash for Q2. That's an increase of 13%. Our active Mileage Plan members were up 15%, and we grew our card program by 10.5%. Both programs continue to outpace our passenger growth.
Our customers increasingly book with us through alaskaair.com, which is both our lowest cost and highest engagement channel. So far this year, sales through alaskaair.com are up 3.6 points to 59.1%, and both web and mobile check-in are up five points each. When speaking of customer loyalty, partnerships are key. And yesterday, we announced a new Mileage Plan partnership with Hainan Airways. Hainan offers a premium experience and flies non-stop to Beijing and Shanghai from Seattle and nearly 70 destinations throughout China.
Alaska's network provides powerful feed to our international partners, allowing them to grow and in turn open up more options for our customers. For example, our feed just to Emirates has doubled in the last two years to 200 passengers a day, allowing Emirates to add a second frequency in Seattle. In fact, since their second frequency add, daily passengers jumped to 275 during July with a peak day of 410 connecting passengers. Hainan and Icelandair both carriers we work with as either a partner or through interline have also increased their international capacity in Seattle, ensuring that our customers have better options for their international travel needs. Creating greater customer affinity and diversifying our revenue base will help us to become successful in the long term.

Our Seattle market share for the last 12 months ended December 31, 2015, given current booking schedules of 51% is unchanged from 12 months ending December 2012. Proof that the changes we have made to our network are working well in the midst of increased competition. As we shift our focus to the back half of the year, Alaska's capacity will be up 7.9% in Q3 and 11.4% in Q4. Stage, gauge and new markets will contribute three points to the third quarter and eight points in the fourth quarter. The remainder is growth in our strong core markets to help us increase our utility. We freed up five aircrafts in the fourth quarter by reducing day of week and frequency flying in markets where supply and demand were not aligned. We'll use these assets to accelerate the launch of new markets.
As we move into Q3, we do have a few things to be mindful of. First, weighted capacity in our Hawaii and Alaska markets is expected to be up 10% and 17% respectively. Yield pressure in Q2 was most acute in these two regions and will continue into Q3. And second, while the rate of competitive capacity increase is trending down, it remains high at 12 points of growth in Q3 and eight points of growth in Q4, driven by new competitive adds to markets such as Pasco, Missoula, Kona, and Orlando.
In summary, we're growing and diversifying revenues and at the same time generating increased customer loyalty, which includes strong growth in our credit card program. We have confidence in the resilience of our business model and we expect our positive momentum to continue.
And with that, I'll turn this over to Brandon.
Brandon S. Pedersen - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President, Finance
Hey, thanks, Andrew. And good morning, everybody. As Brad said, Air Group's adjusted net profit improved by 46% and earnings per share improved by 56%. On an adjusted pre-tax basis, we earned $370 million, nearly $120 million more than last year's second quarter. Most of the profit increase was because of more lower fuel prices. Still, revenues grew by $62 million, outpacing the $52 million increase in non-fuel costs.
We had an exceptional non-fuel cost performance this quarter with CASMex down 3.5% on the 10.5% increase in capacity. We benefited from a large credit from one of our maintenance providers that accounted for much of the decline in CASMex from our early Q2 guidance. But even without that, costs would have come down nicely. As my good friend, our COO, Ben Minicucci, likes to say, good cost performance isn't a finance thing, it's because of the great things happening out in the business. And I couldn't agree more. In that vein, I'd like to share an example with you.
In the last contract with our flight attendants, we introduced a new concept we called a productivity premium, which allows our flight attendants to earn up to $2,500 a year for exceeding their monthly line average each quarter. This new provision has played an important role in our sick time declining by about 10% year-over-year. That's a great outcome and kudos to our flight attendants and in-flight leadership for making it work. Looking forward, we expect ex-fuel costs to be up about 5.5% in the third quarter and down about 2.5% in the fourth.
Let me quickly touch on the drivers of the Q3 increase. First, we've got tough comps in the wages and benefits line because we recorded several favorable benefits adjustments last year. We also got a bit ahead of ourselves with hiring this spring, and it impacted our productivity numbers in the second quarter and it will have an impact on Q3 as well. We're working to fix that now so that we're in better shape going into the fall shoulder season. Second, we're expecting maintenance to jump to its highest level of the year. Last year's numbers also included a favorable settlement with a maintenance vendor. And finally, Q3 has the least capacity growth of any quarter this year, so we don't get as much leverage in the denominator.

We're still planning for a unit cost decline of about 0.5% for the full year, consistent with our earlier guidance, and our longstanding track record of unit cost reduction. Even though we had an outstanding second quarter, we're now expecting higher incentive pay, reflecting our great performance against safety, cost, customer, and profit targets, which is actually a good thing, continued investments in improving our on-board food and beverage product for our customers, and much higher property tax expenses in the second half of the year.
Quickly touching on fuel, our economic fuel cost per gallon was $2.12, down 34%. But more importantly, our fuel burn on an ASM per gallon basis improved by another 1.9% or 2.6% so far this year. Cash flow from operations in the first half of the year was $890 million. On-balance sheet debt is now $745 million, and even when factoring leases, our investment-grade balance sheet has no net debt. I believe we're the only carrier to have net interest income on our P&L. This creates an important cost advantage that drives more profit to the bottom line.
Trailing 12-month after-tax ROIC stands at 22%, almost 600 basis points higher than last year and more than twice our cost of capital. As a result, we're continuing to make smart investments in our business, whether it'd be in new fuel-efficient airplanes, scimitar winglets to improve fuel efficiency, or mobile devices for employees so that they can better serve customers.
We'll take delivery of 11 737-900ERs this year, 19 next year and 12 900ERs and our first MAX in 2017. The vast majority of these airplanes will replace the 27 737-400s we're retiring over the next two years. The result is that Mainline fleet will grow by 10 units this year and six units total over the next two years. These new airplanes will help us further increase our cost advantage over the higher-cost network carriers. We project full-year CapEx to be approximately $750 million, consistent with prior guidance, which would result in us generating about $500 million of free cash flow using consensus estimates.
This quarter, we repurchased 2.5 million shares for $160 million, bringing our year-to-date repurchases to $262 million or the equivalent of about 3% of the total shares outstanding at the beginning of the year. We've now repurchased more than $1 billion of our stocks since 2007. That translates to about one-third of the outstanding shares. Our current $650 million authorization will be completed later this year, and we'll update you on our plans for the next share repurchase authorization once we've met with our board later this summer.
In mid-2013, Alaska initiated a dividend and has paid out $148 million in quarterly dividends in less than two years. Our stock continues to have the highest dividend yield in the airline industry. We're generating strong cash flows that are more diverse than ever. Our investment-grade balance sheet derisks the cash flows to our owners. Our costs continue to come down. We have no net debt. We're buying back a lot of stock, and we're paying a meaningful dividend. This is a high-quality industrial business. And more importantly, our people are taking great care of our customers and running a safe and reliable operation, both things they need to do for us to succeed long term. I want to thank our nearly 15,000 employees for their efforts and congratulate them once again for a record quarter.
And with that, we'll open it up to questions that you may have.
Question-and-Answer Session
Operator
Your first question comes from the line of Savi Syth with Raymond James. Your line is open.
Savanthi N. Syth - Raymond James & Associates, Inc.
Hey, good morning. Just would like to talk a little bit more on the comments about the new market openings and the comment where you opened 18 over the last two or three years, and you're opening 18 in the second half this year. I was just wondering if that then bodes for greater pressure in unit revenues in the second half. And also, as you think about 2016, is this taking advantage of lower fuel this year and, moving forward, some of the markets you would have opened, or should we expect kind of similar new market additions in 2016?

Andrew R. Harrison - Executive Vice President and Chief Revenue Officer
Hi, Savi. This is Andrew.
Savanthi N. Syth - Raymond James & Associates, Inc.
Hey, Andrew.
Andrew R. Harrison - Executive Vice President and Chief Revenue Officer
Just a small correction. The 18 new markets have all been started since the second quarter of 2014, and the additional 18 over the rest of this year. These are not in any way in response to current levels of fuel at all. In fact, if you look at the new markets, 45% of them are actually to destinations that have no year-round, nonstop service today. And as we've shared earlier on the call, these markets are all just expansion and diversification of our revenue streams. As it relates to unit revenue, I don't have the number off the top of my head, but what I will tell you is many of these are mid-continent and transcon longer-stage length markets that we launched.
Bradley D. Tilden - Chief Executive Officer and President
And then, Savi, it's Brad. I was looking at these numbers a couple of days ago. Of those 18 markets, eight of them are markets you know about. It's Charleston, Raleigh, Nashville, Costa Rica, Milwaukee, Oklahoma City. And then there's a bunch in there like Boise-Reno, L.A.-Monterey, Eugene-San Jose, there's some smaller markets in there. So it's not 18 midcon or transcon routes that are being added, just to make sure you have the correct understanding of what's going on.
Savanthi N. Syth - Raymond James & Associates, Inc.
That's helpful. Thank you. And then just a follow-up on another comment about the – being mindful about the third quarter and exposure to Hawaii. And I believe it was the last guy. Could you talk a little bit more about what you're seeing in those markets?
Andrew R. Harrison - Executive Vice President and Chief Revenue Officer
Yes, Savi. Just in general, if you look at – we've talked about our industry ASM, both in Hawaii and Alaska, and especially as we move into the peak summer period, we're seeing higher-than-average industry increases in ASMs in those markets. The good news, though, is we still run good load factors and given our outstanding network. I think we have a number of options, whether it's connecting passengers, management of peak flights to continue to improve the performance of these regions.
Savanthi N. Syth - Raymond James & Associates, Inc.
Okay. That was helpful. Thanks.
Bradley D. Tilden - Chief Executive Officer and President
Thanks, Savi.
Operator
Your next question comes from the line of Julie Yates with Credit Suisse. Your line is open.
Julie A. Yates-Stewart - Credit Suisse Securities (USA) LLC (Broker)
Good morning. Thanks for taking my question.
Bradley D. Tilden - Chief Executive Officer and President
Good morning.
Brandon S. Pedersen - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President, Finance
Good morning, Julie.
Julie A. Yates-Stewart - Credit Suisse Securities (USA) LLC (Broker)
I know it's still early, and you're still finalizing your plans for next year, but any preliminary indication on how you're thinking about capacity and growth opportunities next year, especially if fuel remain sub $60 a barrel?
Andrew R. Harrison - Executive Vice President and Chief Revenue Officer
Hi, Julie. It's Andrew. Thanks for the question. As I mentioned in my prepared remarks, we took a really good look at the fourth quarter and, as I shared, we took five lines of flying out and reallocated those. While we were doing that, we were also looking at our 2016 capacity. And what I can share at this preliminary time is that where we see things today, our growth next year will be lower than our growth this year, and somewhere in the high single-digits. That's all I can share right now.
Julie A. Yates-Stewart - Credit Suisse Securities (USA) LLC (Broker)

Okay. Very helpful. Thank you. And then another question, the rest of your peers saw a pretty dramatic change in the yield environment midway through Q2, and you guys obviously have less exposure in the most affected areas and are actually performing more in line with the A4A average than you have in the past for some time. So would you say you saw any material change in the yield environment in the quarter? Or is it more status quo for you guys with the exception of Hawaii? I'm just trying to think about that in the context of directionally how PRASM year-over-year changes in the second half of the year.
Andrew R. Harrison - Executive Vice President and Chief Revenue Officer
Yeah. I think as we – if I just look back over the last six months, our yield decline have been fairly consistent, give or take a point. Same with our loads. So we haven't really seen a huge underlying change in the pattern. The only real driver for us I think is as we either launch new markets or industry capacity changes a little bit, but the fundamentals of our business, we haven't seen any really shifting.
Julie A. Yates-Stewart - Credit Suisse Securities (USA) LLC (Broker)
Okay. And then any comment on just how we should think about PRASM change trending in the second half of the year as comps ease and competitive capacity growth slows?
Andrew R. Harrison - Executive Vice President and Chief Revenue Officer
We don't really provide any type of guidance like that. So I won't be commenting on that, but thanks for the question.
Julie A. Yates-Stewart - Credit Suisse Securities (USA) LLC (Broker)
Okay. Understood. Thank you.
Bradley D. Tilden - Chief Executive Officer and President
Thanks, Julie.
Operator
Your next question comes from the line of Hunter Keay with Wolfe Research. Your line is open.
Hunter K. Keay - Wolfe Research LLC
Good morning, guys.
Bradley D. Tilden - Chief Executive Officer and President
Good morning, Hunter.
Brandon S. Pedersen - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President, Finance
Hi, Hunter.
Hunter K. Keay - Wolfe Research LLC
So, Brad, did you feel like Alaska has the best opportunity in the industry, at least among airlines that you feel like you're comparable to, so likely excluding some of the ULCCs. Would you say you have the best opportunity in the industry to sustain these margins or at least a level very close to these margins over the next two years to three years in the event that the fuel prices rise, given the huge pill you guys just swallowed from competitive capacity growth that was unique to you and given the line of sight that you have on your non-fuel costs?
Bradley D. Tilden - Chief Executive Officer and President
Hunter, thanks for the question. I might not bite on the industry part of it. But what I would say is that we're feeling really, really good. These markets that we just launched in the Milwaukee and Oklahoma City, Portland, St. Louis, we're going to do Portland to Austin, they look like they're going to have fantastic returns. We're super excited about moving into Raleigh and Charleston and Nashville, Costa Rica, there's a lot of excitement.
When we look at things, and we're sort of following all of the concern about PRASM and all that, when we look at this, we're deploying capacity that's producing great results, great profits for our business. So we're excited about doing that. And I don't know. As I look at us against the industry, what I would say is that we do have great operational performance. We've got a very good competitive position with respect to our cost structure, which gives us the ability to offer low fares.
And you hear us talking a little bit more about service. The reason this company is still here today and independent is because we give our customers great service and we're trying to let our employees know that we know that, and we value them, and we value what they're doing for our customers. So without saying too much about the other guys, what I would say is we feel very good about the growth that Alaska's putting into the marketplace and it's great in this environment that we're sort of expanding our capital base and are expanding our revenue base and doing that in a way that's helping the owners of the business.

Hunter K. Keay - Wolfe Research LLC
Okay, Brad. Thanks. And...
Bradley D. Tilden - Chief Executive Officer and President
Yeah.
Hunter K. Keay - Wolfe Research LLC
Brandon, a 5% – the cash deployment obviously is great, on many levels, on an absolute level. A 5% capital deployment yield is not that compelling with record margins and peak margins, if you want to call it that. So, I guess, can you help me understand the value proposition of continuing to buy planes with cash? I mean, I think you said you had, what, 80 of them already you own free and clear. So with interest rates at these levels, again, with the caveat that the buyback is already very robust, why aren't you borrowing more money and buying back more stock at this point?
Brandon S. Pedersen - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President, Finance
Hi, Hunter.
Hunter K. Keay - Wolfe Research LLC
Hi.
Brandon S. Pedersen - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President, Finance
That fits squarely into the what have you done for me lately category. I actually don't feel bad about where our balance sheet is. We have kind of a fortress balance sheet going right now. We're proud of the fact that we've been able to finance all our CapEx with operating cash flow and that there's still a whole bunch of money left over for us to return to our shareholders. We've always said that we would use that to manage the capital structure and we originally thought we would probably do that in 2015. But cash flow has been really strong, and so I think that we'll probably end up not doing that in 2015, but perhaps early in 2016. But that doesn't mean that we're not really focused on making sure that our capital structure sits in the right place and that we're doing the right things for our owners in terms of capital return.
Hunter K. Keay - Wolfe Research LLC
All right, Brandon. Thank you a lot.
Bradley D. Tilden - Chief Executive Officer and President
Thanks, Hunter.
Operator
Your next question comes from the line of Joseph DeNardi with Stifel. Your line is open.
Joseph W. DeNardi - Stifel, Nicolaus & Co., Inc.
Hey. Thanks. Good morning.
Bradley D. Tilden - Chief Executive Officer and President
Morning.
Joseph W. DeNardi - Stifel, Nicolaus & Co., Inc.
Brad, I think on the last call you talked about kind of maybe revisiting the fourth quarter capacity outlook, and sounds like Andrew did that to some extent and redeployed some of that capacity. So, I guess, why was that decision made? And what makes you feel comfortable that kind of coming in at the higher end of the guidance is the right way to do it?
Bradley D. Tilden - Chief Executive Officer and President
Yeah. Thanks, Joe. Yeah. So let's just talk about that a little bit more. I think what we would say is that we totally agree with the sort of the premise of your question, which is that understanding the natural demand and getting the capacity right is the best thing you can do to sort of ensure that you have profitable returns on your investment. So we went through our fourth quarter schedule, and we did day of week cuts, we did time of day cuts, and we actually produced five – we reduced our flying by five airplanes, which on a base of 140 is a lot.
And then the question is what – and that will help all of the returns and all of those, whatever, 250 city pairs or whatever it is. And then we took those five airplanes and said what's the best thing to do with them. Is the best thing to park them and sort of let them sit idle or is the best thing to deploy them in new markets where we can deploy them and produce returns that exceed our cost of capital. So, I guess, what we're saying, Joe, is we do agree with the premise of the question, and I think you're going to see some of the economic benefit come through with that, but we did redeploy the airplanes.

Having said all of that, I will also tell you that as we think about our 2016 growth, our mindset has moved a little bit in the last couple of months. As we look at everything that we're looking at, we were thinking of something a little more robust a couple of months ago and we're actually bringing that number down. We haven't actually shared that number with the Street yet, but our mindset has come down by two percentage points or three percentage points from where it would have been, let's just say 60 days ago or something like that.
Joseph W. DeNardi - Stifel, Nicolaus & Co., Inc.
Okay. That's helpful. I guess, kind of following onto that, I mean, should we assume that if your ROIC continues to exceed your cost of capital the way it is, that you're going to exercise all of your CapEx options and that number's going to continue to go up and your capacity run-rate is going to be higher than the historical average?
Bradley D. Tilden - Chief Executive Officer and President
Yeah. I think – I'm not sure – I might need to think about your question a little bit more. But I do think that we are going to try to do the right thing. I think the company has been a leader in this area. We're going to do the right thing for the owners of this business. If the right thing is to take new capital and deploy it in places that we've got a tremendous economic engine here and it's sort of rooted in Seattle. If the right place is to grow Seattle and invest in Seattle, I think you will see us do that. But we will also – I don't know, as I just said in my earlier response, we do understand that getting capacity right is a big part of having the right returns on an investment and we will – I think this company has been quite good at that and I think you should expect us to continue to be focused on it.
Joseph W. DeNardi - Stifel, Nicolaus & Co., Inc.
Okay. And then if I could just slip in a last one for Andrew. American getting to a single res system later this year, can you quantify what benefit you might realize from that based on some discussions you're having with them about new opportunities once they get that?
Andrew R. Harrison - Executive Vice President and Chief Revenue Officer
Yeah, Joe. Actually, I'm going to provide more information later on through the quarter on this. What I will tell you is, to your point, a single res system opens up significant ability for our customers to have a massively expanded network from which to accrue and redeem miles on. We continue to see double-digit growth in our relationship with sharing passengers with American. And again, as this unfolds and we get better visibility, we'll definitely share more with you on this topic.
Joseph W. DeNardi - Stifel, Nicolaus & Co., Inc.
Okay. Thank you.
Bradley D. Tilden - Chief Executive Officer and President
Thanks, Joe.
Operator
Your next question comes from the line of Helane Becker with Cowen. Your line is open.
Helane R. Becker - Cowen & Co. LLC
Thanks, operator. Hi, everybody. Thanks for the time. I have two questions – or three questions. One is, Seattle I think is one of the fastest growing cities in the country, and maybe the fastest. And as you think about all these passengers who are traveling through your airport, what type of investment should we think about that you have to make in airport infrastructure to handle the growth?
Benito Minicucci - Chief Operating Officer and Executive Vice President, Operations, Alaska Airlines, Inc.
Helane, it's Ben. It's a great question, Helane. I'm going to say about a year ago, we did see some issues processing passengers. I'll tell you what we did, at the ticket counter area, we almost doubled our size in taking more ticket counter space. So where it was very congested, now it flows fairly easily. I can tell you on the gates, we optimized how we use our gate to get quicker turns on our gates to make sure we could deal with increased capacity. We're also using gates across the whole airport, so from the south end to the north end.

And third, we're investing in technology. I think we're working on technology where customers can quickly get into the gate – get from the curb to the gate in under 60 minutes. And I think that's one thing there. And then the biggest one is an investment in our North Satellite which is about a $400 million investment that will add approximately eight gates over the next two years to four years.
Helane R. Becker - Cowen & Co. LLC
You said curb to gate in less than 60 minutes. Isn't that a long time, though?
Benito Minicucci - Chief Operating Officer and Executive Vice President, Operations, Alaska Airlines, Inc.
Well. Sorry. One of the things we were looking at was how you drop your bags. So, for example, if you show up at the curb, you can get through the ticket counter in under 60 seconds. Thank you for correcting me. (39:10)
Helane R. Becker - Cowen & Co. LLC
Yeah, all right. I was prepared to be scared. And then I think, Brad, you said there was a board meeting coming up this summer. Is that when we would hear you think about reauthorizing or increasing the share repurchase program? I mean, we think you only have about $120 million left, based on your information today. So why wouldn't you have increased it?
Bradley D. Tilden - Chief Executive Officer and President
That would be a good time for us to talk with the board about a question like that. In the board meetings in early August, 3rd, 4th, 5th of August, something like that.
Helane R. Becker - Cowen & Co. LLC
Okay. Great. All right. Well, thanks. Those were all my questions.
Bradley D. Tilden - Chief Executive Officer and President
Thanks, Helane.
Benito Minicucci - Chief Operating Officer and Executive Vice President, Operations, Alaska Airlines, Inc.
Thanks, Helane.
Operator
Your next question comes from the line of Jamie Baker with JPMorgan. Your line is open.
Jamie N. Baker - JPMorgan Securities LLC
Hey, good morning, team. Sort of continuing on that last point, I don't want to take anything away from your second quarter. You were absolutely correct to point out the strength in margins, the degree to which ROIC exceeded that of last year, best quarter in the your history, and so forth. No argument. No pushback on any of that.
But what is lacking in the release today is how these results might be impacting your behavior going forward. I mean, ordinarily, I also would have expected perhaps an upward revision to your ROIC target or maybe another added layer to the buyback or a boosted dividend. And I don't want to read too much into this, but why the conservatism in light of such strong results? Is it merely that you just haven't met with the board yet? Or are you keeping your powder deliberately dry for something else? And, of course, that will lead us to speculate on what that might be.
Brandon S. Pedersen - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President, Finance
Jamie, it's Brandon. Maybe I'll take that and Brad can clean up the mess that I make. I don't think you should read anything into our lack of a big bang of any sort. We're really proud of our second quarter results. We think we're doing the right thing for the business not just in the short-term and the long term. And you know Alaska, we have sort of a methodical way of doing things. We think about longer term, things like the longer-term track record of dividend increases that we want to show you years from now. We think about the timing of board meetings for authorization of share repurchase program. But I don't think you should necessarily read anything into the fact that we had a great quarter, but we didn't take some big bold action. I think those things will come with time and we'll continue our track record of doing the right things for our customers and our owners and our shareholders.

Bradley D. Tilden - Chief Executive Officer and President
And Jamie, just to put a little bit of punch on that. I think in time you will see a new – and I shouldn't speak for the board, but you know our history with share repurchases, and I think it would be totally appropriate to assume that that continues. We do want to increase the dividend regularly. I think you should expect to see that occur. And we have been talking about this ROIC goal, and what – we've been talking about that a little bit in the last few days, I think as we sort of put the finishing touches on our 2016 plan, that might be a time for us to come out with some new thinking on that. But I'll tell you that we sort of do – we have done a lot of looking not just at airlines but at high-quality industrial companies. And we're sort of getting ourselves schooled up on what are they generally earning in terms of returns – in terms of what's the gap in terms of ROICs above their cost of capital and getting ourselves smarter about that. And I think you'll see something from us there as well.
Jamie N. Baker - JPMorgan Securities LLC
It's a high-grade analysis to be conducting, I'm sure. Okay. Thanks very much for that color. That was excellent. I appreciate it.
Bradley D. Tilden - Chief Executive Officer and President
Yeah.
Brandon S. Pedersen - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President, Finance
Thanks, Jamie.
Operator
Your next question comes from the line of Duane Pfennigwerth with Evercore ISI. Your line is open.
Duane Pfennigwerth - Evercore ISI
Hey. Thanks.
Bradley D. Tilden - Chief Executive Officer and President
Hi, Duane.
Brandon S. Pedersen - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President, Finance
Good morning, Duane.
Duane Pfennigwerth - Evercore ISI
Just following up to Helane's question a little bit on Seattle and the capacity utilization of that airport today. As it relates to Alaska and also competitors that are trying to grow there, can you talk about how much excess capacity there is in that airport at sort of peak times of the day?
Benito Minicucci - Chief Operating Officer and Executive Vice President, Operations, Alaska Airlines, Inc.
No – Duane, it's Ben. Peak times of the day, there is no capacity. I can tell you that. There are capacity in the shoulders and as we talked to the port here, long term in the next two years to five years, six years when these capital projects get built for bigger gates, there are going to be constraints even at the peak time of day. So peak time of days this airport is full, unless you do some other type of thing. But I would say that that's the quick answer. We're full at the peak, there's some capacity in the shoulders.
Duane Pfennigwerth - Evercore ISI
Thanks for that. And then, Brandon, just a quick one for you. How do you expect us to believe your cost guidance for the third quarter?
Brandon S. Pedersen - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President, Finance
Duane, I expect you to believe our cost guidance because that's what we've put in our investor update, and we try our best to forecast our costs for the quarter and for the year. And what I will tell you is things come earlier sometimes than we expect, and things come later sometimes than we expect. And our costs – we adjust our cost guidance through the quarter. And as you saw this quarter, our actual cost result was right in the range of our last investor update.
Duane Pfennigwerth - Evercore ISI
Okay. Thanks very much.
Bradley D. Tilden - Chief Executive Officer and President
Thanks, Duane.
Brandon S. Pedersen - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President, Finance
Thanks, Duane.
Operator
Your next question comes from the line of Darryl Genovesi with UBS. Your line is open.
Darryl Genovesi - UBS Securities LLC
Hi, guys. Thanks for taking the question.

Bradley D. Tilden - Chief Executive Officer and President
Hi, Darryl.
Darryl Genovesi - UBS Securities LLC
Brandon, I was going to ask you about the CASM guidance for the third quarter as well. I think Duane kind of took care of it. But, I mean, just thinking about how the guidance has changed for the full year relative to the guidance that you provided us with Q1 results back in April, I heard the list of items that you kind of rattled off. It seem to me that maybe the maintenance credit was perhaps the only one that you wouldn't have seen coming. So just wondering with the level of – with the magnitude of the beat and the Q2 cost trajectory, why wouldn't the full year move?
Brandon S. Pedersen - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President, Finance
Darryl, it's Brandon. Thanks for the questions. Just to give you a little bit of context, there was a big maintenance credit in the quarter and that was worth about 2% of the 3.5% reduction in unit costs and then just good cost performance in the last month and just normal closing stuff was about the other 1.5% of that. Our actual cost result was at the low end of the range that we provided. So we were within the range.
You're right. In my prepared remarks, I did try to give context to the Q3 increase in cost. And what I will say is there's things that – as I said to Duane, there are things that result and just timing things landing in one quarter or another, and in this quarter we've got things that make a really hard comp and so we're up 5.5%.
Notwithstanding that, we still think that we're down 0.5% for the year. Your question might be how come we're not leveraging more of that cost savings in Q2 into the back half. It's an excellent question. We would like to do more. We're super focused on cost reductions, but there are some things like incentive pay that is higher than we expect, property taxes that were much higher than we expected, and continued investments into the on-board product that's going to eat up some of that goodness that we saw in the second quarter.
Darryl Genovesi - UBS Securities LLC
Okay. Thanks for that. And then I also just want to ask you quickly on the fuel efficiency of the fleet. I think you said it's up 2.6%, 2.6% better over the course of the last two quarters. I think you were kind of 2.5% better on average in 2014 compared to 2013 as well. Should we essentially assume that you're on kind of a 200 basis points, 250 basis points a year sort of improvement trajectory until you're done retiring all the classics?
Mark G. Eliasen - Treasurer & Vice President-Finance
Hey, Daryl. It's Mark Eliasen. I'll just say that we're focused on fuel efficiency in all aspects of our business. We do think that getting the classics out of there, as you know we have 27 of them, they burn the same amount of fuel as a 900ER, yet carry 25% fewer passengers. So as we get those 27 out of the fleet over the next year-and-a half, that will improve our fuel efficiency. I can't give you the exact number as far as how many bps that will improve it. But that, along with many other things we're doing, you should see our fuel efficiency continue to rise.
Darryl Genovesi - UBS Securities LLC
Right.
Bradley D. Tilden - Chief Executive Officer and President
Yeah. We could run those numbers, but there's a bunch of retirements. What is it, Mark? 27 737-400 retirements in 2016 and 2017?
Mark G. Eliasen - Treasurer & Vice President-Finance
Yeah. In the next year-and-a-half.
Bradley D. Tilden - Chief Executive Officer and President
It should pop pretty substantially when that occurs.
Mark G. Eliasen - Treasurer & Vice President-Finance
Yeah. And our winglet program, we're putting winglets – the split winglets on our NG fleet, so that will help as well. And then, of course, when we get the MAX in 2017, that's going to be another improvement. So we see continued fuel efficiency improvements throughout as long as we can see.

Darryl Genovesi - UBS Securities LLC
Great. Thanks very much, guys.
Bradley D. Tilden - Chief Executive Officer and President
Yeah.
Mark G. Eliasen - Treasurer & Vice President-Finance
Thank you.
Operator
Your next question comes from the line of David Fintzen from Barclays. Your line is open.
David Fintzen - Barclays Capital, Inc.
Hey, good morning, everyone. First question really for Andrew. If my memory serves, going back to the Investor Day, you had started to talk about kind of filling out the Seattle markets that you hadn't touched historically. Obviously, you've been doing that this year. Can you just help us think through 2016? I mean, are you largely through that process, or are there sort of another wave of markets that you think could keep you busy in Seattle and maybe then into Portland for a while?
Andrew R. Harrison - Executive Vice President and Chief Revenue Officer
Yeah. Good morning. I think while we don't talk about future markets, I have shared in my prepared remarks, we've got the Embraer 175 coming on-board, which – this aircraft actually allows us to unlock cities that we really can't fly on the Q4s and the mainline jets profitably. So I think you're going to continue to see us continue to work those types of markets.
And as such as new markets, I didn't get a chance to mention but like, as Brad mentioned on competition, just looking at the second quarter, about 8.5% of our capacity was driven by first-class ASM. But our revenues contribution by that was over 14%. And so we continue to look at our cabins and our classes of service. And I still believe there's big opportunity to continue to invest in our product in the first class and increase that.
But overall, in the Pacific Northwest, as we continue to manage our costs, as we continue to look at our network and grow our network and grow our connections as well as our international connections, we continue to see opportunity to grow in the Pacific Northwest.
David Fintzen - Barclays Capital, Inc.
Okay. That's helpful. And just to sort of mix a little bit of what you said in terms of improve the product with some of the cost comments, I mean, should we think of that product improvement as sort of when we get a sustained beat in a quarter, not to get too carried away with it over – for some period? Because it will just accelerate some of those investments in on-board product? I mean, is that the way we should translate that comment into cost going forward?
Andrew R. Harrison - Executive Vice President and Chief Revenue Officer
No. I don't think so. I think when you look at, like Brandon shared, around like for instance, food and beverage. But as traditional here, when we launch new products, we have a lot of process, boarded to consumed ratios of foods. We have a lot of opportunity, even though we're adding cost to our aircraft through investments on on-board products to actually continue to get more efficient and productivity. And I think Ben's become – and his team have become just amazing folks of getting capacity out of our core operations. And so, as we invest in our product, we're going to get better about getting efficiency and productivity out of that as well. So, personally, I think you shouldn't expect to see that continued cost increase overall.
Brandon S. Pedersen - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President, Finance
Hey, David, it's Brandon. One other thought there. We talk a lot about the drivers of the cost increases and we get into things like food and beverage. A lot of our on-board product is buy-on-board and we're seeing nice growth in buy-on-board sales. The customers really – there is a good uptake of that product and that's pretty small in the context of the revenue line, but it is an offset to the cost that we talk about down below.

David Fintzen - Barclays Capital, Inc.
Okay. That's helpful. Appreciate all that color. Thanks.
Brandon S. Pedersen - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President, Finance
Okay. Thank you.
Operator
Your next question comes from the line of Richard Salazaar with Deutsche Bank. Your line is open.
Michael J. Linenberg - Deutsche Bank Securities, Inc.
Hey, it's Mike Linenberg. If I could just jump in, in front of Rich, if that's okay. Good morning, everyone.
Brandon S. Pedersen - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President, Finance
Hey, Mike.
Bradley D. Tilden - Chief Executive Officer and President
Good morning.
Michael J. Linenberg - Deutsche Bank Securities, Inc.
Two questions here. Andrew, if I could just go back to what you had mentioned earlier about the connection with Emirates. You said that previously it was 200 passengers a day between you and them, and that with the second flight that that had moved to 270 passengers. How much of that is stimulative or is that just all shift – share shift?
Andrew R. Harrison - Executive Vice President and Chief Revenue Officer
I don't know the exact answer to that question. But what I'll tell you is that and you even take out Hainan, for instance, where the marketing machine has been set on idle and has done nothing, we're already seeing significant increases in connecting traffic there. And we haven't even begun to market this new relationship. So I can't speak to where it's coming, where it's going as far as stimulation or share shift. All I know is that there is good demand for these connections and we're going to continue to grow.
Michael J. Linenberg - Deutsche Bank Securities, Inc.
And when you mentioned the marketing machine on idle, that's because, as I recall correctly, I don't think you have a codeshare with Emirates. Is that right, or do you have one?
Andrew R. Harrison - Executive Vice President and Chief Revenue Officer
So I think with the Hainan, but even as we think about our international partners and we talk about how we can market better together in the marketplace, we just – we have not done a good job at leveraging our international carriers and working together to become more of a joint force in the marketplace, and you're going to see more of that. And I think there's going to be good things in store.
Michael J. Linenberg - Deutsche Bank Securities, Inc.
Okay. Just to be clear, you don't have a codeshare with them, with Emirates, that's right?
Andrew R. Harrison - Executive Vice President and Chief Revenue Officer
Correct.
Michael J. Linenberg - Deutsche Bank Securities, Inc.
Okay. And then just secondly, on some of these new markets out of Los Angeles, like Costa Rica, I think Baltimore is another one. Correct me if I'm wrong on that, but they have lower yield. Are these markets going to receive the support of American marketing from day one? Or are you going to have the American codeshare on them or is that a longer-term opportunity?
Andrew R. Harrison - Executive Vice President and Chief Revenue Officer
You know what, I can't really comment on future code and no code. But I think what a fair statement of facts are is that both American and Alaska are very excited about our partnership. We are working together where we can, and Los Angeles is a natural partnership ground for us there. And I think as we launch any new market, we think about our customer base, our alliances and partnerships and how can we work together.
Michael J. Linenberg - Deutsche Bank Securities, Inc.
Okay, great. And so they're already being marketed though, right? You've already loaded the flights to Costa Rica and Baltimore?
Andrew R. Harrison - Executive Vice President and Chief Revenue Officer
Correct.
Michael J. Linenberg - Deutsche Bank Securities, Inc.
Okay. Okay, great. Okay. Very good. Thank you.

Bradley D. Tilden - Chief Executive Officer and President
Thanks, Mike.
Operator
Your next question comes from the line of Daniel McKenzie with Buckingham Research. Your line is open.
Dan J. McKenzie - The Buckingham Research Group, Inc.
Hey, good morning, guys. Thanks for the time here. A couple questions. Where is the analysis leading you on a more expanded preferred seating product? So call it five or six rows with more legroom versus what's offered today. How are you balancing the pros and cons of that investment with what your codeshare partners are already doing?
Andrew R. Harrison - Executive Vice President and Chief Revenue Officer
Dan, as Brad alluded in his prepared remarks, we're finding some very interesting results just with our preferred seating and the behaviors. And as we've mentioned before, we continue to look at our on-board product in maximizing revenue for each shift that we fly and looking at the loyalty program. So all I can say is that we continue to look at how this plays out for us. And we don't have anything to report other than that.
Dan J. McKenzie - The Buckingham Research Group, Inc.
Okay. Very good. And, I guess, just following up on Mike's question, there's obviously a lot of moving pieces with respect to revenue from codeshare partners. But where are we today exactly? So what is the total revenue from codeshare partners, and does that reflect a decline or an increase from a year ago? And how do we think about that revenue – that piece of the revenue puzzle looking ahead?
Andrew R. Harrison - Executive Vice President and Chief Revenue Officer
I mean, I think – I mean, if you just look at Q2, really big picture including interline, codes, partners, everybody, I think it's about 15% comes from those other carriers. And as we've shared previously income buckets, Delta is down over 40% in the second quarter, but we also have good increases on our own metal and our partner's metal. So it's shifting around. But overall, it's still fairly stable as the big picture pie goes, as it relates to connectivity.
Dan J. McKenzie - The Buckingham Research Group, Inc.
Good job, Andrew. If I can just squeeze one final one here. Bill Gates had a nice interview this quarter on biofuels. And if you believe him, probably will be a huge payday some day. You guys are one of the first to stick your toes in the water here years ago. And I realize the investment is tiny and notwithstanding where oil is today, is this something you guys are still pursuing? And if so, when could the investment realistically drive some kind of a return?
Joseph A. Sprague - Vice President-Marketing, Alaska Airlines, Inc.
Hey, Dan. This is Joe Sprague. Biofuels is absolutely something we're still interested in. In fact, we're hoping to do yet another demonstration flight later this year with a new type of biofuels. As you pointed out, we were the first airline in the country to fly a series of biofuels flights when we did so a couple of years ago. Notwithstanding the lower fuel prices today, we do believe that this is an important part of our fuel supply going forward, both for fuel efficiency, fuel cost reasons, but also just for really positive environmental reasons.
And, in fact, that the airline industry is going to have some sort of standard that they're going to have to adhere to coming down from ICAO in the years ahead, and we think biofuels is going to have to be a part of that solution. So our intent is to absolutely continue to be a leader in this area. A challenge is the lack of production facilities for biofuels, and that's starting to be addressed a little bit around the country. But we're tracking that very closely and working with our good partners at Boeing and elsewhere to make certain that we are in a position that we can optimize that when more fuel supply comes online.

Dan J. McKenzie - The Buckingham Research Group, Inc.
Very good. Thanks, guys.
Andrew R. Harrison - Executive Vice President and Chief Revenue Officer
Thanks, Dan.
Bradley D. Tilden - Chief Executive Officer and President
Thank you.
Lavanya Sareen - Managing Director-Investor Relations
We have time for one more question.
Operator
Your next question comes from the line of Rajeev Lalwani with Morgan Stanley. Your line is open.
Rajeev Lalwani - Morgan Stanley & Co. LLC
Hi. Thanks for squeezing me in here.
Bradley D. Tilden - Chief Executive Officer and President
Hi, Rajeev.
Brandon S. Pedersen - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President, Finance
Hi, Rajeev.
Rajeev Lalwani - Morgan Stanley & Co. LLC
Just a question on the cost side. I get there is a fair amount of moving parts this year, but can you just talk going forward maybe what some of the biggest risks are for you in terms of continuing to keep CASMex at sort of a flat to down level?
Brandon S. Pedersen - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President, Finance
Rajeev, good morning. It's Brandon. Thinking into the future, we said a couple of times tonight or this morning that our bias is to continue to work toward driving costs down to make us look more like a low cost carrier and expand the gap that we have over the legacy carriers.
In terms of risk, you never know. One thing we do have is nice visibility to our labor costs over the next few years. I think we've talked about the increase in fuel or the increase in our fuel competitiveness, but as we think about fuel CASM coming down. Other than that, it's all about investments that we have and we choose to make. Who knows what's going to happen to pension. That's always one that seems to come out and bite us somehow. But I don't know. It's a good question. I don't have anything specific to offer in terms of risks, because I think we do have pretty good visibility over the next couple of years.
Rajeev Lalwani - Morgan Stanley & Co. LLC
Great. That was it, gentlemen.
Brandon S. Pedersen - Chief Financial Officer & Executive Vice President, Finance
Thanks.
Bradley D. Tilden - Chief Executive Officer and President
Thank you.
Bradley D. Tilden - Chief Executive Officer and President
Okay, everybody. I think we are at the end of the hour, and I'm guessing that there's another call starting now. Thanks for tuning in, and we look forward to speaking with you next quarter.
Operator
Thank you for participating in today's conference call. This call will be available for future playback at www.alaskaair.com. You may now disconnect.
Copyright policy: All transcripts on this site are the copyright of Seeking Alpha. However, we view them as an important resource for bloggers and journalists, and are excited to contribute to the democratization of financial information on the Internet. (Until now investors have had to pay thousands of dollars in subscription fees for transcripts.) So our reproduction policy is as follows: You may quote up to 400 words of any transcript on the condition that you attribute the transcript to Seeking Alpha and either link to the original transcript or to www.SeekingAlpha.com. All other use is prohibited.
THE INFORMATION CONTAINED HERE IS A TEXTUAL REPRESENTATION OF THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S CONFERENCE CALL, CONFERENCE PRESENTATION OR OTHER AUDIO PRESENTATION, AND WHILE EFFORTS ARE MADE TO PROVIDE AN ACCURATE TRANSCRIPTION, THERE MAY BE MATERIAL ERRORS, OMISSIONS, OR INACCURACIES IN THE REPORTING OF THE SUBSTANCE OF THE AUDIO PRESENTATIONS. IN NO WAY DOES SEEKING ALPHA ASSUME ANY RESPONSIBILITY FOR ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS MADE BASED UPON THE INFORMATION PROVIDED ON THIS WEB SITE OR IN ANY TRANSCRIPT. USERS ARE ADVISED TO REVIEW THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S AUDIO PRESENTATION ITSELF AND THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S SEC FILINGS BEFORE MAKING ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS.

If you have any additional questions about our online transcripts, please contact us at: transcripts@seekingalpha.com. Thank you!
About this article:ExpandTagged: Services, Regional Airlines, TranscriptsError in this transcript? Let us know.Contact us to add your company to our coverage or use transcripts in your business.Learn more about Seeking Alpha transcripts here.Follow SA Transcripts and get email alertsSearch TranscriptThis transcriptFindAll transcriptsFindCompare To:All ALK TranscriptsOther Companies in this sector





Services including Restaurant and Retail Stocks | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Services including Restaurant and Retail StocksSherwin-Williams: Strong Q2 Thanks To Newly Acquired ValsparSHW• Today, 5:02 PM • Sure Dividend•3 CommentsTJX Isn't Getting 'Amazoned,' But It Still Isn't Cheap EitherTJX• Today, 3:32 PM • Shareholders Unite•8 CommentsCan Teekay Corporation Rescue Teekay Offshore PartnersTK• Today, 3:10 PM • Long Player•29 CommentsKansas City Southern Bucks Last Week's Class I Sell-OffKSU• Today, 11:07 AM • James Sands•2 CommentsDelta - Life Isn't FairDAL• Today, 7:19 AM • Michael Rogus•22 CommentsDunkin' Brands Discounted Cash Flow Valuation: Buying OpportunityDNKN• Today, 6:57 AM • Sean Warneke•2 CommentsAvoid Sears Stock Like The PlagueSHLD• Today, 6:36 AM • Christopher Yuen•51 CommentsAthenahealth - Beauty Is In The Eye Of The BeholderATHN• Today, 4:04 AM • Christopher Speetzen•1 CommentL.B. Foster - Prices Have Recovered But Remain UndervaluedFSTR• Today, 3:23 AM • DTF Capital•2 CommentsIndependent News & Media Plc - Has The World Really Ended?Editors' Pick • INNZF• Yesterday, 11:14 AM • Philip Ryan•4 CommentsBuy Chipotle Stock Amid Recent Outbreak FearsCMG• Yesterday, 8:48 AM • Christopher Yuen•126 CommentsGreene King: Is The 5% Yield Enough?GKNGY, GRKGF• Yesterday, 8:36 AM • Mark Dockray•10 CommentsFundamentals And Technicals Agree On W.W. Grainger StockGWW• Fri, Jul. 21, 7:35 PM • Aleksandar Vichev•11 CommentsThe Long Case For LiLACEditors' Pick • LILA• Fri, Jul. 21, 4:00 PM • Stephen SarokiThe Short Case For Singapore Press HoldingsEditors' Pick • SGPRY, SGPRF• Fri, Jul. 21, 4:00 PM • Warren Chan•2 CommentsBed & Bath Beyond: A No Brainer, Management Optionality UndervaluedBBBY• Fri, Jul. 21, 3:24 PM • Kario-Paul Brown•9 CommentsComcast And Liberty Global Invest In Integrate's Demand MarTechLBTYA• Fri, Jul. 21, 3:24 PM • Donovan Jones•2 CommentsWhy Air France-KLM Is In A BubbleAFRAF• Fri, Jul. 21, 3:23 PM • Wubbe Bos•4 CommentsKroger's Recent Price Weakness Might Just Be A Good LossKR• Fri, Jul. 21, 3:00 PM • Chuck Carnevale•78 CommentsWag Of Approval For PetIQPETQ• Fri, Jul. 21, 1:56 PM • Don Dion•1 CommentGNC: I'm Not Bluffing With Pocket DeucesGNC• Fri, Jul. 21, 1:37 PM • Courage & Conviction Investing•49 CommentsDynaCert: Promising To Boost Transportation Business Profit MarginsDYFSF• Fri, Jul. 21, 1:00 PM • Research & Investment•6 CommentsNew Stocks In Exec Comp And ROIC Model Portfolio: July 2017FL• Fri, Jul. 21, 12:26 PM • David Trainer•1 CommentDollar Tree: Paying The Growth Premium Is Not Worth The RiskDLTR• Fri, Jul. 21, 11:43 AM • Samuel Smith•10 CommentsMoody's Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesMCO• Fri, Jul. 21, 11:42 AM • SA TranscriptsNetflix: Does Growth Justify The Valuation?NFLX• Fri, Jul. 21, 11:31 AM • Hudson River Capital Research•60 CommentsSprouts Is Not Sprouting HigherSFM, WFM• Fri, Jul. 21, 10:45 AM • Martin Hausman•5 CommentsLowes: Contrarian Play Post Sears/Amazon DealLOW• Fri, Jul. 21, 10:41 AM • L&F Capital Management•11 CommentseBay: Results Bemuse The StreetEBAY• Fri, Jul. 21, 10:30 AM • Quad 7 Capital•19 CommentsDividend Champion On Clearance Rack And In My PortfolioTGT• Fri, Jul. 21, 9:48 AM • Colorado Wealth Management Fund•212 CommentsA Bidding War For Advisory Board CompanyABCO• Fri, Jul. 21, 9:27 AM • Ensemble CapitalPapa Murphy's Holdings: An Overlooked Competitor In A Crowded SpaceEditors' Pick • FRSH• Fri, Jul. 21, 9:19 AM • Dining Stocks Online•13 CommentsHome Depot - Don't Panic, BuyHD• Fri, Jul. 21, 9:00 AM • Leo Nelissen•28 CommentsDineEquity And Its 9% DividendDIN• Fri, Jul. 21, 8:51 AM • Prescient Investment Analysis•8 CommentsNo Need To Ditch UnitedUAL• Fri, Jul. 21, 8:51 AM • Detroit Bear•2 CommentsKansas City Southern 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesKSU• Fri, Jul. 21, 8:33 AM • SA TranscriptsDryShips Inc.: Reverse Split Selling Is Not Over YetDRYS• Fri, Jul. 21, 8:30 AM • Morningsidepark•97 CommentsHome Depot: What Changed?HD• Fri, Jul. 21, 2:24 AM • Joseph Harry•31 CommentsDunkin' Brands: A No-Frills 20% OpportunityDNKN• Fri, Jul. 21, 12:29 AM • Black Coral Research•6 CommentsWill No Direct Competition Help WWE Offset Declining Viewership?WWE• Thu, Jul. 20, 5:43 PM • Jeremy McKinzie•7 CommentseBay Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesEBAY• Thu, Jul. 20, 5:01 PM • SA TranscriptsHome Depot: A Dividend Growth Stock With A 29% Increase This YearHD• Thu, Jul. 20, 3:29 PM • Ploutos Investing•15 CommentsDisney Is A Buy, But Not Because Of Spider-ManDIS• Thu, Jul. 20, 2:54 PM • Black Coral Research•12 CommentsAutoZone Is The Deal Of The CenturyAZO• Thu, Jul. 20, 2:27 PM • Bank On Insight•34 CommentsUnion Pacific Surprises AgainUNP• Thu, Jul. 20, 1:35 PM • Jonathan Weber•25 CommentsNetflix's Success Driven By What Drives Other Tech Giants' SuccessesNFLX• Thu, Jul. 20, 1:16 PM • Gary Bourgeault•22 CommentsDryShips: Don't EvenDRYS• Thu, Jul. 20, 12:32 PM • Daniel Jones•68 CommentsNetflix: Warning Flags FlyingNFLX• Thu, Jul. 20, 12:23 PM • Michael Wiggins De Oliveira•31 CommentsGet On Board These Rail StocksNSC, KSU, GWR• Thu, Jul. 20, 12:21 PM • Zacks Investment Research•2 CommentsScholastic Corporation 2017 Q4 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesSCHL• Thu, Jul. 20, 11:19 AM • SA TranscriptsThe Sherwin-Williams Company 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesSHW• Thu, Jul. 20, 10:57 AM • SA TranscriptsOmnicom Group Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesOMC• Thu, Jul. 20, 10:03 AM • SA TranscriptsRite Aid: Don't Be FooledRAD• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:55 AM • Kumquat Research•151 CommentsDryShips' All-Time High - $1.47 Billion A Share?DRYS• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:49 AM • Research & Investment•45 CommentsCSX Pullback After Second Quarter Earnings Is JustifiedCSX• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:16 AM • James Sands•8 CommentsUnion Pacific Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesUNP• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:10 AM • SA TranscriptsBurlington Stores Looks TemptingEditors' Pick • BURL• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:08 AM • Vince Martin•4 CommentsWhole Foods: No Point In HoldingWFM• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:05 AM • Growth And Value•11 CommentsC.H. Robinson Worldwide Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesCHRW• Thu, Jul. 20, 8:25 AM • SA TranscriptsHyatt Is The Tom Brady Of Lodging, But It Is Still Just A HoldH• Thu, Jul. 20, 8:03 AM • Sam Lin, CFA•1 CommentHertz: A Revolutionary New Business Model With Self-Driving Cars?CAR, HTZ• Thu, Jul. 20, 7:47 AM • JD Henning•3 CommentsChipotle - A Risk/Reward Discussion Based On Relative ValuationCMG• Thu, Jul. 20, 7:40 AM • Kenra Investors•22 CommentsE-Sports Aren't Yet A Threat To The NBA And MLBBATRK, MSG, MSGN• Thu, Jul. 20, 6:26 AM • Strubel Investment ManagementPublicis Groupe S.A. ADR 2017 Q1 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesPUBGY• Thu, Jul. 20, 6:07 AM • SA TranscriptsUnited Airlines: Street Has OverreactedUAL• Thu, Jul. 20, 5:51 AM • D.M. Martins Research•8 CommentsMcDonald's Is A WinnerMCD• Thu, Jul. 20, 5:09 AM • L&F Capital Management•7 CommentsAmazon's Making It Tough To Be A Costco ShareholderCOST• Thu, Jul. 20, 2:42 AM • Matt Hogan•36 CommentsAbercrombie & Fitch: Will Buyback Be Resumed?ANF• Thu, Jul. 20, 12:14 AM • Anthony Breen•11 CommentsBuckle Is Not Going AnywhereBKE• Wed, Jul. 19, 4:26 PM • Aleksandar Vichev•5 CommentsCanadian Pacific Railway Limited 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesCP• Wed, Jul. 19, 4:23 PM • SA TranscriptsUnited Continental Holdings, Inc 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesUAL• Wed, Jul. 19, 4:10 PM • SA TranscriptsAvis Budget Group Shareholders Will Not Be RewardedCAR• Wed, Jul. 19, 3:48 PM • Michael Wiggins De Oliveira•18 CommentsCato Is An Easy Short, Even At 6x P/EEditors' Pick • CATO• Wed, Jul. 19, 3:32 PM • Vince Martin•6 CommentsRebutting The Chipotle BearsCMG• Wed, Jul. 19, 3:23 PM • Mike Berner•104 CommentsWhat To Look For From Sirius Next WeekSIRI• Wed, Jul. 19, 2:59 PM • Crunching Numbers•87 Comments123456...799Next Page









Access to this page has been denied.














Please verify you are a human





            Please click "I am not a robot" to continue
          



            Access to this page has been denied because we believe you are using automation tools to browse the website.
          

            This may happen as a result of the following:
          


              Javascript is disabled or blocked by an extension (ad blockers for example)
            

              Your browser does not support cookies
            


            Please make sure that Javascript and cookies are enabled on your browser and that you are not blocking them from loading.
          

            Reference ID: #684a9510-7012-11e7-ae8a-33a461f15d34
          





            Powered by
            PerimeterX
            , Inc.
          













  Page not found































Stay Connected

Latest Posts in RSS

BusinessEntertainmentFeatured NewsFeatured Press ReleaseFinanceHealthLifestyleNationNon FirstPageOriginalPress ReleaseReviewShoppingSportsStocksTechnologyTravelWorld


Latest Comments in RSS


 / 













EmpoweredNews
World News Summary Helping You Stay Informed









Business
Finance
Sports
Entertainment
Health
Technology
Travel
Shopping




Our Writers
About Us
Privacy Policy
Contact Us
Advertise
Press Releases





Oops! There was a 404 Error! Page Not Found.


Unfortunately the page you were looking for could not be found. Possibly you have done a typo error in the address or the page might have been removed from this website.




 Latest News 
EVP, CL&AO of Vertex Pharmaceuticals Incorpor (NASDAQ:VRTX), Parini Michael, sells 10,829 shares worth $1,743,469
CEO & President of Vertex Pharmaceuticals Incorpor (NASDAQ:VRTX), Leiden Jeffrey M, sells 184,374 shares worth $29,684,214
EVP GMDA, CMO of Vertex Pharmaceuticals Incorpor (NASDAQ:VRTX), Chodakewitz Jeffrey, sells 39,833 shares worth $6,413,113
EVP, Global Research and CSO of Vertex Pharmaceuticals Incorpor (NASDAQ:VRTX), Altshuler David, sells 28,979 shares worth $4,665,619
EVP\Chief Commercial Officer of Vertex Pharmaceuticals Incorpor (NASDAQ:VRTX), Arbuckle Stuart A, sells 89,400 shares worth $14,441,830
See Remarks of Aimmune Therapeutics (NASDAQ:AIMT), Sheehy Douglas T., sells 7,460 shares worth $161,558
SVP and General Counsel of NxStage Medical (NASDAQ:NXTM), Swan Winifred L, sells 3,500 shares worth $84,560
Chief Product Officer of Facebook (NASDAQ:FB), Cox Christopher K, sells 16,000 shares worth $2,628,483
Founder & Executive Chairman of Ellie Mae (NYSE:ELLI), Anderman Sigmund, sells 1,319 shares worth $144,958
Chief Financial Officer of Civitas Solutions (NYSE:CIVI), Holler Denis M., sells 5,300 shares worth $101,230

 


News Categories 
Business (7)

Stocks (15,219)



Entertainment (1,297)

Featured News (3,487)

Featured Press Release (250,694)

Finance (309)

Health (653)

Lifestyle (19)

Nation (90)

Non FirstPage (2)

Original (47)

Press Release (18)

Review (1)

Shopping (267)

Sports (613)

Technology (195)

Travel (286)

World (1,368)


  Featured Press Releases 
Global ECG (Electrocardiogram) Monitoring Equipment Sales Industry Report:  Sales Volume Market Share by Type and Application
Global Curling Equipments Sales Industry Report:  Sales Volume Market Share by Type and Application
Global Diagnostics PCR Sales Market Sales Volume (Million Units) and Growth Rate (2012-2022) Analysis in a Latest Research Report
Global Concrete Saw Sales Market Sales Volume (Million Units) and Growth Rate (2012-2022) Analysis in a Latest Research Report
Global Direct Water Dispensers Sales Industry Report:  Sales Volume Market Share by Type and Application
Global ECG (Electrocardiogram) Monitoring Equipment Sales Industry Report:  Sales Volume Market Share by Type and Application
Global Dual Voltage Comparator Sales Industry Report:  Sales Volume Market Share by Type and Application
Global Contact Prober Sales Industry Report:  Sales Volume Market Share by Type and Application
Global CT Contrast Injectors Sales Industry Report:  Sales Volume Market Share by Type and Application
Global Counter-IED Equipments Sales Industry Report:  Sales Volume Market Share by Type and Application






Photo Gallery



Bulletproof Helmet Market Review and Forecast 2017



PayPal Withdrawing Support For Kindle Fire, BlackBerry And Windows Phone



Revival Of Nashville Discussed



Brawl Erupts After Jose Bautista Downed By Rougned Odor Punch



VR Tour Offered Three Decades After Chernobyl Disaster



Kyle Busch Sweeps NASCAR Events At Martinsville





Business
Finance
Sports
Entertainment
Health
Technology
Travel
Shopping
 

About Us
Contact Us
Privacy Policy
Advertise
Press Releases
Terms Of Service
 
Log in 










   Bradley Tilden | | ZoomInfo.com










 




Bradley Tilden |  | Decypha

































Sign In
|
Welcome  Guest 









 







Regions

GCC
                                |
                                    Levant
                                |
                                    MENA
                                |
                                    North Africa




GCC

Bahrain
                            |
                            Kuwait
                            |
                            Oman
                            |
                            Qatar
                            |
                            Saudi Arabia
                            |
                            United Arab Emirates




Levant

Iraq
                            |
                            Jordan
                            |
                            Lebanon
                            |
                            Palestine




North Africa

Egypt
                            |
                            Libya
                            |
                            Morocco
                            |
                            Tunisia




Others

Iran
                            |
                            Turkey
                            |
                            United Kingdom
                            |
                            United States












Advanced Search















News






Markets






Companies






Research






Funds






Fixed Income






Money Markets






Commodities






FX






Economics






Analysis






More











Sign In
Membership
Customize Your Decypha
Logout
Welcome
Decypha Alerts












Home




People Profiles




People Profile



Bradley Tilden Profile














Full Name:

                                                    Bradley Tilden
                                                







Country:











Biography


                                                    Bradley D. Tilden (age 50) has served as President of Alaska Airlines since December 2008. He was appointed to the Board of the Company in May 2010, and... 











Designations




Date
Designation
Entity
Entity Description
Country




2010


Flow International Corporation

--

                                                United States




2010


Alaska Air Group, Inc.

--

--









Check all the  individuals in 
Check The List






Request a Trial
















Title:*


Select
Mr
Mrs
Ms
Miss
Dr
Prof




First Name:*



Last Name:*



Job Title:*


Select
 Asset Managers
 Corporate Banks
 Investment Managers
 Wealth Managers
 Consultants & Advisors
 Legal Practioners
 Academics
 Hedge Funds
 Private Equity Analysts
 Traders
 Equity Research Analysts




Phone:*



Company:*




Email:*




Country:*


Select

                                                Afganistan
                                        

                                                Albania
                                        

                                                Algeria
                                        

                                                American Samoa
                                        

                                                Andorra
                                        

                                                Angola
                                        

                                                Anguilla
                                        

                                                Antarctica
                                        

                                                Antigua and Barbuda
                                        

                                                Argentina
                                        

                                                Armenia
                                        

                                                Aruba
                                        

                                                Australia
                                        

                                                Austria
                                        

                                                Azerbaijan
                                        

                                                Bahamas
                                        

                                                Bahrain
                                        

                                                Bangladesh
                                        

                                                Barbados
                                        

                                                Belarus
                                        

                                                Belgium
                                        

                                                Belize
                                        

                                                Benin
                                        

                                                Bermuda
                                        

                                                Bhutan
                                        

                                                Bolivia
                                        

                                                Bosnia and Herzegovina
                                        

                                                Botswana
                                        

                                                Bouvet Island
                                        

                                                Brazil
                                        

                                                British Indian Ocean Territory
                                        

                                                Brunei
                                        

                                                Bulgaria
                                        

                                                Burkina Faso
                                        

                                                Burundi
                                        

                                                Cambodia
                                        

                                                Cameroon
                                        

                                                Canada
                                        

                                                Cape Verde
                                        

                                                Cayman Islands
                                        

                                                Central African Republic
                                        

                                                Chad
                                        

                                                Chile
                                        

                                                China
                                        

                                                Christmas Island
                                        

                                                Cocos (Keeling) Islands
                                        

                                                Colombia
                                        

                                                Comoros
                                        

                                                Congo
                                        

                                                Cook Islands
                                        

                                                Costa Rica
                                        

                                                Cote D'Ivoire (Ivory Coast)
                                        

                                                Croatia (Hrvatska)
                                        

                                                Cuba
                                        

                                                Curacao
                                        

                                                Cyprus
                                        

                                                Czech Republic
                                        

                                                Czechoslovakia (former)
                                        

                                                Denmark
                                        

                                                Djibouti
                                        

                                                Dominica
                                        

                                                Dominican Republic
                                        

                                                East Timor
                                        

                                                Ecuador
                                        

                                                Egypt
                                        

                                                El Salvador
                                        

                                                Equatorial Guinea
                                        

                                                Eritrea
                                        

                                                Estonia
                                        

                                                Ethiopia
                                        

                                                Falkland Islands (Malvinas)
                                        

                                                Faroe Islands
                                        

                                                Fiji
                                        

                                                Finland
                                        

                                                France
                                        

                                                France, Metropolitan
                                        

                                                French Guiana
                                        

                                                French Polynesia
                                        

                                                French Southern Territories
                                        

                                                Gabon
                                        

                                                Gambia
                                        

                                                Georgia
                                        

                                                Germany
                                        

                                                Ghana
                                        

                                                Gibraltar
                                        

                                                Greece
                                        

                                                Greenland
                                        

                                                Grenada
                                        

                                                Guadeloupe
                                        

                                                Guam
                                        

                                                Guatemala
                                        

                                                Guernsey
                                        

                                                Guinea
                                        

                                                Guinea-Bissau
                                        

                                                Guyana
                                        

                                                Haiti
                                        

                                                Heard and McDonald Islands
                                        

                                                Honduras
                                        

                                                Hong Kong
                                        

                                                Hungary
                                        

                                                Iceland
                                        

                                                India
                                        

                                                Indonesia
                                        

                                                Iran
                                        

                                                Iraq
                                        

                                                Ireland
                                        

                                                Isle of Man
                                        

                                                Israel
                                        

                                                Italy
                                        

                                                Jamaica
                                        

                                                Japan
                                        

                                                Jersey
                                        

                                                Jordan
                                        

                                                Kazakhstan
                                        

                                                Kenya
                                        

                                                Kiribati
                                        

                                                Kuwait
                                        

                                                Kyrgyzstan
                                        

                                                Laos
                                        

                                                Latvia
                                        

                                                Lebanon
                                        

                                                Lesotho
                                        

                                                Liberia
                                        

                                                Libya
                                        

                                                Liechtenstein
                                        

                                                Lithuania
                                        

                                                Luxembourg
                                        

                                                Macau
                                        

                                                Macedonia
                                        

                                                Madagascar
                                        

                                                Malawi
                                        

                                                Malaysia
                                        

                                                Maldives
                                        

                                                Mali
                                        

                                                Malta
                                        

                                                Marshall Islands
                                        

                                                Martinique
                                        

                                                Mauritania
                                        

                                                Mauritius
                                        

                                                Mayotte
                                        

                                                Mexico
                                        

                                                Micronesia
                                        

                                                Moldova
                                        

                                                Monaco
                                        

                                                Mongolia
                                        

                                                Montenegro
                                        

                                                Montserrat
                                        

                                                Morocco
                                        

                                                Mozambique
                                        

                                                Myanmar
                                        

                                                Namibia
                                        

                                                Nauru
                                        

                                                Nepal
                                        

                                                Netherlands
                                        

                                                Netherlands Antilles
                                        

                                                Neutral Zone
                                        

                                                New Caledonia
                                        

                                                New Zealand (Aotearoa)
                                        

                                                Nicaragua
                                        

                                                Niger
                                        

                                                Nigeria
                                        

                                                Niue
                                        

                                                Norfolk Island
                                        

                                                North Korea
                                        

                                                Northern Mariana Islands
                                        

                                                Norway
                                        

                                                Oman
                                        

                                                Pakistan
                                        

                                                Palau
                                        

                                                Palestine
                                        

                                                Panama
                                        

                                                Papua New Guinea
                                        

                                                Paraguay
                                        

                                                Peru
                                        

                                                Philippines
                                        

                                                Pitcairn
                                        

                                                Poland
                                        

                                                Portugal
                                        

                                                Puerto Rico
                                        

                                                Qatar
                                        

                                                Reunion
                                        

                                                Romania
                                        

                                                Russia
                                        

                                                Rwanda
                                        

                                                S. Georgia and S. Sandwich Isls.
                                        

                                                Saint Kitts and Nevis
                                        

                                                Saint Lucia
                                        

                                                Saint Vincent and the Grenadines
                                        

                                                Samoa
                                        

                                                San Marino
                                        

                                                Sao Tome and Principe
                                        

                                                Saudi Arabia
                                        

                                                Senegal
                                        

                                                Serbia
                                        

                                                Seychelles
                                        

                                                Sierra Leone
                                        

                                                Singapore
                                        

                                                Slovak Republic
                                        

                                                Slovenia
                                        

                                                Solomon Islands
                                        

                                                Somalia
                                        

                                                South Africa
                                        

                                                South Korea
                                        

                                                South Sudan
                                        

                                                Spain
                                        

                                                Sri Lanka
                                        

                                                St. Helena
                                        

                                                St. Pierre and Miquelon
                                        

                                                Sudan
                                        

                                                Suriname
                                        

                                                Svalbard and Jan Mayen Islands
                                        

                                                Swaziland
                                        

                                                Sweden
                                        

                                                Switzerland
                                        

                                                Syria
                                        

                                                Taiwan
                                        

                                                Tajikistan
                                        

                                                Tanzania
                                        

                                                Thailand
                                        

                                                Togo
                                        

                                                Tokelau
                                        

                                                Tonga
                                        

                                                Trinidad and Tobago
                                        

                                                Tunisia
                                        

                                                Turkey
                                        

                                                Turkmenistan
                                        

                                                Turks and Caicos Islands
                                        

                                                Tuvalu
                                        

                                                US Minor Outlying Islands
                                        

                                                USSR (former)
                                        

                                                Uganda
                                        

                                                Ukraine
                                        

                                                United Arab Emirates
                                        

                                                United Kingdom
                                        

                                                United States
                                        

                                                Uruguay
                                        

                                                Uzbekistan
                                        

                                                Vanuatu
                                        

                                                Vatican City State (Holy See)
                                        

                                                Venezuela
                                        

                                                Vietnam
                                        

                                                Virgin Islands (British)
                                        

                                                Virgin Islands (U.S.)
                                        

                                                Wallis and Futuna Islands
                                        

                                                Western Sahara
                                        

                                                Yemen
                                        

                                                Yugoslavia
                                        

                                                Zaire
                                        

                                                Zambia
                                        

                                                Zimbabwe
                                        




Comments:





*Required Fields


 

 Submit








Already Registered?








Login attempt was not successful. Please try again








Username/ Email:



Password:





Enter Characters:















 

 Login





 Forget your password?
























By Job Title


Asset Managers |
                                    Corporate Banks |
                                    Investment Managers |
                                    Wealth Managers |
                                    Consultants & Advisors |
                                    Legal Practitioners |
                                    Academics |
                                    Hedge Funds |
                                    Private Equity Analysts |
                                    Traders |
                                    Equity Research Analysts


By Scope


Equity |
                                    Fixed Income |
                                    Funds |
                                    Excel  |
                                    Analytical Tools  |
                                    Markets  |
                                    Prices  |
                                    Money Market |
                                    News |
                                    Industry |
                                    IPOs |
                                    Mergers & Acquisitions |
                                    Commodities |
                                    Economics



Covered Countries and Exchanges

















Add Your Company | 
                                        Add Yourself | 
                                        Terms and Conditions | 
                                        Privacy Policy | 
                                        About DirectFN









Copyright ©  DirectFN. All Rights Reserved.











Data Not Available









Login











Login attempt was not successful. Please try again


Username/ Email:


Password:



Enter Characters:











 Forget your password?











Back to Top

Support & Feedback


Ask for free trial









Request a Trial
















Title:*


Mr
Mrs
Ms
Miss
Dr
Prof




First Name:*



Last Name:*



Email:*




Phone:*



Promo. Code:



Country:*


Select
Afganistan
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antarctica
Antigua and Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Botswana
Bouvet Island
Brazil
British Indian Ocean Territory
Brunei
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Colombia
Comoros
Congo
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Cote D'Ivoire (Ivory Coast)
Croatia (Hrvatska)
Cuba
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Czechoslovakia (former)
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
East Timor
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands (Malvinas)
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
France, Metropolitan
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern Territories
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guernsey
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Heard and McDonald Islands
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran
Iraq
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Jamaica
Japan
Jersey
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Macedonia
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Micronesia
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montenegro
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
Neutral Zone
New Caledonia
New Zealand (Aotearoa)
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
North Korea
Northern Mariana Islands
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Palestine
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Reunion
Romania
Russia
Rwanda
S. Georgia and S. Sandwich Isls.
Saint Kitts and Nevis
Saint Lucia
Saint Vincent and the Grenadines
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome and Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Serbia
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Slovak Republic
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
South Korea
South Sudan
Spain
Sri Lanka
St. Helena
St. Pierre and Miquelon
Sudan
Suriname
Svalbard and Jan Mayen Islands
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syria
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad and Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos Islands
Tuvalu
US Minor Outlying Islands
USSR (former)
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Vatican City State (Holy See)
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands (British)
Virgin Islands (U.S.)
Wallis and Futuna Islands
Western Sahara
Yemen
Yugoslavia
Zaire
Zambia
Zimbabwe




Company:*



Job Title:


Select
 Academics
 Asset Managers
 Consultants & Advisors
 Corporate Banks
 Equity Research Analysts
 Hedge Funds
 Investment Managers
 Legal Practioners
 Private Equity Analysts
 Traders
 Wealth Managers




Comments:




*Required Fields


 

 Submit



















Contact Us












Hello ,Please use the below form for
                            Product support & feedback


Name :  *  


Email:  * 


Phone Number :  * 






Preferred contact method :
Email
Phone











Technical Support 24x7: +94 112 314900 / slhops@directfn.net
Your Account Manager is, , , 






















 Get a Decypha Membership to view this content..................







Get a Decypha Membership


 Get the membership of Decypha Premium Package to access more exciting features including advanced analytical tools and the Pro 10 package. Pro 10 is designed keeping active investors in mind and offers a flexible framework to view information and do analysis the way you desire.

All you need to access these valuable features is to click on the Get a membership button and submit your details to our sales team.















Upgrade your Membership


 Account is not entitled to view this information.

 Please contact your account manager to upgrade your Membership.

Email :  support@decypha.com






 Register to view this content..................







 Decypha Free Registration


Register free with Decypha and get access to real-time price information and many other features including Technical Scanner, Fundamental Screener etc.

Just click the Registration button, submit your details and get registered for free.








 




Brad Tilden - Wikipedia





















 






Brad Tilden

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Brad Tilden


Born
Issaquah, Washington, U.S.


Nationality
American


Occupation
President of Alaska Airlines


Years active
2008–present


Bradley D. Tilden is president and chief executive officer of Alaska Airlines and Alaska Air Group which is the parent company of Alaska Airlines and its sister carrier Horizon Air. On May 15, 2012 Tilden replaced Bill Ayer as the company's chief executive officer.[1][2] On July 14, 2012 former Alaska Air Group's CEO Bill Ayer announced that he would be stepping down and named Tilden as his replacement. Prior to becoming the company's President in 2008 Tilden served as Alaska Air Group's chief financial officer and executive vice president of finance, leading the Finance, Information Technology, Planning, Revenue Management and Corporate Real Estate organizations.[3] In 2015, Tilden was named Executive of the Year by the Puget Sound Business Journal.[4]
Background[edit]
Tilden is an Eagle Scout.[5] As a young student Tilden's love of airplanes began on a field trip to the airport where he saw his first Boeing 727.[6] After graduating from Highline High School in 1979[7] Tilden enrolled at Pacific Lutheran University. Originally planning on becoming a teacher Tilden eventually became interested in business and would earn a degree in business administration and accounting.[6] Following graduation Tilden worked for eight years at the accounting firm Price Waterhouse at its offices in Seattle, Washington and Melbourne, Australia.[8] In 1991 Tilden interviewed and was hired by Alaska Airlines. In 1997 he would earn his Masters in Business Administration from the University of Washington.

References[edit]



^ Gates, Dominic. "Brad Tilden new Alaska Air CEO as Bill Ayer announces retirement". The Seattle Times. Retrieved 21 February 2012. 
^ "Alaska Air Group Corporate Governance - Management". Alaska Air Group, Inc. Retrieved 21 February 2012. 
^ "Alaska Airlines Executive Leadership". Alaska Air Group, Inc. Retrieved 21 February 2012. 
^ http://www.bizjournals.com/seattle/blog/2015/12/the-2015-psbj-executive-of-the-year-has-led-his.html
^ http://blog.scoutingmagazine.org/2015/09/04/check-months-cover-alaska-airlines-magazine/#more-44996
^ a b "Chance class project inspires Tilden's airline career". Scene. PLU. Retrieved 21 February 2012. 
^ "Highline Schools Foundation gives out gold stars to five outstanding individuals". Highline Times. Retrieved 22 February 2012. 
^ Clements, Barbara. "Tilden Flies High as Alaska Airlines' new president". PLU. Retrieved 21 February 2012. 









v
t
e


Alaska Air Group



Certificated airlines



Alaska Airlines
Horizon Air
Virgin America





Heritage companies



Air Oregon
Alaska Coastal Airlines
Barnhill & McGee Airways
Jet America Airlines
McGee Airways
Star Air Service
Transwestern Airlines





Destinations



Alaska Airlines destinations
Horizon Air destinations
Virgin America destinations





Marketing brands



Alaska Horizon
Alaska SkyWest





Major incidents



Flight 261
Flight 779
Flight 1866





People



Bill Ayer
Bill Boyer Jr.
Bruce R. Kennedy
Linious "Mac" McGee
Brad Tilden





Namesakes



Alaska Airlines Arena
Alaska Airlines Center
Horizon Air Summer Series








List of airline holding companies










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Brad_Tilden&oldid=727000040"					
Categories: Alaska Air Group peopleAmerican airline chief executivesLiving peoplePeople from Issaquah, WashingtonAmerican chief financial officersEagle ScoutsPacific Lutheran University alumniUniversity of Washington alumniHidden categories: Articles with hCardsYear of birth missing (living people) 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 25 June 2016, at 23:07.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Brad Tilden - Wikipedia





















 






Brad Tilden

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Brad Tilden


Born
Issaquah, Washington, U.S.


Nationality
American


Occupation
President of Alaska Airlines


Years active
2008–present


Bradley D. Tilden is president and chief executive officer of Alaska Airlines and Alaska Air Group which is the parent company of Alaska Airlines and its sister carrier Horizon Air. On May 15, 2012 Tilden replaced Bill Ayer as the company's chief executive officer.[1][2] On July 14, 2012 former Alaska Air Group's CEO Bill Ayer announced that he would be stepping down and named Tilden as his replacement. Prior to becoming the company's President in 2008 Tilden served as Alaska Air Group's chief financial officer and executive vice president of finance, leading the Finance, Information Technology, Planning, Revenue Management and Corporate Real Estate organizations.[3] In 2015, Tilden was named Executive of the Year by the Puget Sound Business Journal.[4]
Background[edit]
Tilden is an Eagle Scout.[5] As a young student Tilden's love of airplanes began on a field trip to the airport where he saw his first Boeing 727.[6] After graduating from Highline High School in 1979[7] Tilden enrolled at Pacific Lutheran University. Originally planning on becoming a teacher Tilden eventually became interested in business and would earn a degree in business administration and accounting.[6] Following graduation Tilden worked for eight years at the accounting firm Price Waterhouse at its offices in Seattle, Washington and Melbourne, Australia.[8] In 1991 Tilden interviewed and was hired by Alaska Airlines. In 1997 he would earn his Masters in Business Administration from the University of Washington.

References[edit]



^ Gates, Dominic. "Brad Tilden new Alaska Air CEO as Bill Ayer announces retirement". The Seattle Times. Retrieved 21 February 2012. 
^ "Alaska Air Group Corporate Governance - Management". Alaska Air Group, Inc. Retrieved 21 February 2012. 
^ "Alaska Airlines Executive Leadership". Alaska Air Group, Inc. Retrieved 21 February 2012. 
^ http://www.bizjournals.com/seattle/blog/2015/12/the-2015-psbj-executive-of-the-year-has-led-his.html
^ http://blog.scoutingmagazine.org/2015/09/04/check-months-cover-alaska-airlines-magazine/#more-44996
^ a b "Chance class project inspires Tilden's airline career". Scene. PLU. Retrieved 21 February 2012. 
^ "Highline Schools Foundation gives out gold stars to five outstanding individuals". Highline Times. Retrieved 22 February 2012. 
^ Clements, Barbara. "Tilden Flies High as Alaska Airlines' new president". PLU. Retrieved 21 February 2012. 









v
t
e


Alaska Air Group



Certificated airlines



Alaska Airlines
Horizon Air
Virgin America





Heritage companies



Air Oregon
Alaska Coastal Airlines
Barnhill & McGee Airways
Jet America Airlines
McGee Airways
Star Air Service
Transwestern Airlines





Destinations



Alaska Airlines destinations
Horizon Air destinations
Virgin America destinations





Marketing brands



Alaska Horizon
Alaska SkyWest





Major incidents



Flight 261
Flight 779
Flight 1866





People



Bill Ayer
Bill Boyer Jr.
Bruce R. Kennedy
Linious "Mac" McGee
Brad Tilden





Namesakes



Alaska Airlines Arena
Alaska Airlines Center
Horizon Air Summer Series








List of airline holding companies










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Brad_Tilden&oldid=727000040"					
Categories: Alaska Air Group peopleAmerican airline chief executivesLiving peoplePeople from Issaquah, WashingtonAmerican chief financial officersEagle ScoutsPacific Lutheran University alumniUniversity of Washington alumniHidden categories: Articles with hCardsYear of birth missing (living people) 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 25 June 2016, at 23:07.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 










Creative Commons — Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported
— CC BY-SA 3.0 






















Skip to content








 Menu















Help us build a vibrant, collaborative global commons
Donate Now














Creative Commons


Creative Commons License Deed







Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported

(CC BY-SA 3.0)








This is a human-readable summary of (and not a substitute for) the license.


Disclaimer.






You are free to:


Share — copy and redistribute the material in any medium or format


Adapt — remix, transform, and build upon the material


for any purpose, even commercially.

















The licensor cannot revoke these freedoms as long as you follow the license terms.




Under the following terms:



Attribution — You must give appropriate credit, provide a link to the license, and indicate if changes were made. You may do so in any reasonable manner, but not in any way that suggests the licensor endorses you or your use.




Attribute this work:












ShareAlike — If you remix, transform, or build upon the material, you must distribute your contributions under the same license as the original.








No additional restrictions — You may not apply legal terms or technological measures that legally restrict others from doing anything the license permits.






Notices:



You do not have to comply with the license for elements of the material in the public domain or where your use is permitted by an applicable exception or limitation.


No warranties are given. The license may not give you all of the permissions necessary for your intended use. For example, other rights such as publicity, privacy, or moral rights may limit how you use the material.








Learn more about CC licensing, or use the license for your own material.






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
Make a Donation






This page is available in the following languages:


Castellano
Castellano (España)
Català
Dansk
Deutsch
English
Esperanto
français
Galego
hrvatski
Indonesia
Italiano
Latviski
Lietuvių
Melayu
Nederlands
Norsk
polski
Português
Português (BR)
română
Slovenščina
Suomeksi
svenska
Türkçe
íslenska
česky
Ελληνικά
Беларуская
русский
українська
العربية
پارسی
中文
日本語
華語 (台灣)
한국어






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
When you share, everyone wins.





Contribute today to Creative Commons




$100



$50



$25



$5































Disclaimer

This deed highlights only some of the key features and terms of the actual license. It is not a license and has no legal value. You should carefully review all of the terms and conditions of the actual license before using the licensed material.
Creative Commons is not a law firm and does not provide legal services. Distributing, displaying, or linking to this deed or the license that it summarizes does not create a lawyer-client or any other relationship.




What does "Attribute this work" mean?


The page you came from contained embedded licensing metadata, including how the creator wishes to be attributed for re-use. You can use the HTML here to cite the work. Doing so will also include metadata on your page so that others can find the original work as well.




The applicable mediation rules will be designated in the copyright notice published with the work, or if none then in the request for mediation. Unless otherwise designated in a copyright notice attached to the work, the UNCITRAL Arbitration Rules apply to any arbitration.
More info.




If supplied, you must provide the name of the creator and attribution parties, a copyright notice, a license notice, a disclaimer notice, and a link to the material. CC licenses prior to Version 4.0 also require you to provide the title of the material if supplied, and may have other slight differences.
More info.




In 4.0, you must indicate if you modified the material and retain an indication of previous modifications. In 3.0 and earlier license versions, the indication of changes is only required if you create a derivative.
Marking guide.
More info.




You may also use a license listed as compatible at https://creativecommons.org/compatiblelicenses
More info.




A commercial use is one primarily intended for commercial advantage or monetary compensation.
More info.




Merely changing the format never creates a derivative.
More info.




The license prohibits application of effective technological measures, defined with reference to Article 11 of the WIPO Copyright Treaty.
More info.




The rights of users under exceptions and limitations, such as fair use and fair dealing, are not affected by the CC licenses.
More info.




You may need to get additional permissions before using the material as you intend.
More info.























Brad Tilden - Wikipedia





















 






Brad Tilden

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Brad Tilden


Born
Issaquah, Washington, U.S.


Nationality
American


Occupation
President of Alaska Airlines


Years active
2008–present


Bradley D. Tilden is president and chief executive officer of Alaska Airlines and Alaska Air Group which is the parent company of Alaska Airlines and its sister carrier Horizon Air. On May 15, 2012 Tilden replaced Bill Ayer as the company's chief executive officer.[1][2] On July 14, 2012 former Alaska Air Group's CEO Bill Ayer announced that he would be stepping down and named Tilden as his replacement. Prior to becoming the company's President in 2008 Tilden served as Alaska Air Group's chief financial officer and executive vice president of finance, leading the Finance, Information Technology, Planning, Revenue Management and Corporate Real Estate organizations.[3] In 2015, Tilden was named Executive of the Year by the Puget Sound Business Journal.[4]
Background[edit]
Tilden is an Eagle Scout.[5] As a young student Tilden's love of airplanes began on a field trip to the airport where he saw his first Boeing 727.[6] After graduating from Highline High School in 1979[7] Tilden enrolled at Pacific Lutheran University. Originally planning on becoming a teacher Tilden eventually became interested in business and would earn a degree in business administration and accounting.[6] Following graduation Tilden worked for eight years at the accounting firm Price Waterhouse at its offices in Seattle, Washington and Melbourne, Australia.[8] In 1991 Tilden interviewed and was hired by Alaska Airlines. In 1997 he would earn his Masters in Business Administration from the University of Washington.

References[edit]



^ Gates, Dominic. "Brad Tilden new Alaska Air CEO as Bill Ayer announces retirement". The Seattle Times. Retrieved 21 February 2012. 
^ "Alaska Air Group Corporate Governance - Management". Alaska Air Group, Inc. Retrieved 21 February 2012. 
^ "Alaska Airlines Executive Leadership". Alaska Air Group, Inc. Retrieved 21 February 2012. 
^ http://www.bizjournals.com/seattle/blog/2015/12/the-2015-psbj-executive-of-the-year-has-led-his.html
^ http://blog.scoutingmagazine.org/2015/09/04/check-months-cover-alaska-airlines-magazine/#more-44996
^ a b "Chance class project inspires Tilden's airline career". Scene. PLU. Retrieved 21 February 2012. 
^ "Highline Schools Foundation gives out gold stars to five outstanding individuals". Highline Times. Retrieved 22 February 2012. 
^ Clements, Barbara. "Tilden Flies High as Alaska Airlines' new president". PLU. Retrieved 21 February 2012. 









v
t
e


Alaska Air Group



Certificated airlines



Alaska Airlines
Horizon Air
Virgin America





Heritage companies



Air Oregon
Alaska Coastal Airlines
Barnhill & McGee Airways
Jet America Airlines
McGee Airways
Star Air Service
Transwestern Airlines





Destinations



Alaska Airlines destinations
Horizon Air destinations
Virgin America destinations





Marketing brands



Alaska Horizon
Alaska SkyWest





Major incidents



Flight 261
Flight 779
Flight 1866





People



Bill Ayer
Bill Boyer Jr.
Bruce R. Kennedy
Linious "Mac" McGee
Brad Tilden





Namesakes



Alaska Airlines Arena
Alaska Airlines Center
Horizon Air Summer Series








List of airline holding companies










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Brad_Tilden&oldid=727000040"					
Categories: Alaska Air Group peopleAmerican airline chief executivesLiving peoplePeople from Issaquah, WashingtonAmerican chief financial officersEagle ScoutsPacific Lutheran University alumniUniversity of Washington alumniHidden categories: Articles with hCardsYear of birth missing (living people) 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 25 June 2016, at 23:07.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Brad Tilden - Wikipedia





















 






Brad Tilden

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Brad Tilden


Born
Issaquah, Washington, U.S.


Nationality
American


Occupation
President of Alaska Airlines


Years active
2008–present


Bradley D. Tilden is president and chief executive officer of Alaska Airlines and Alaska Air Group which is the parent company of Alaska Airlines and its sister carrier Horizon Air. On May 15, 2012 Tilden replaced Bill Ayer as the company's chief executive officer.[1][2] On July 14, 2012 former Alaska Air Group's CEO Bill Ayer announced that he would be stepping down and named Tilden as his replacement. Prior to becoming the company's President in 2008 Tilden served as Alaska Air Group's chief financial officer and executive vice president of finance, leading the Finance, Information Technology, Planning, Revenue Management and Corporate Real Estate organizations.[3] In 2015, Tilden was named Executive of the Year by the Puget Sound Business Journal.[4]
Background[edit]
Tilden is an Eagle Scout.[5] As a young student Tilden's love of airplanes began on a field trip to the airport where he saw his first Boeing 727.[6] After graduating from Highline High School in 1979[7] Tilden enrolled at Pacific Lutheran University. Originally planning on becoming a teacher Tilden eventually became interested in business and would earn a degree in business administration and accounting.[6] Following graduation Tilden worked for eight years at the accounting firm Price Waterhouse at its offices in Seattle, Washington and Melbourne, Australia.[8] In 1991 Tilden interviewed and was hired by Alaska Airlines. In 1997 he would earn his Masters in Business Administration from the University of Washington.

References[edit]



^ Gates, Dominic. "Brad Tilden new Alaska Air CEO as Bill Ayer announces retirement". The Seattle Times. Retrieved 21 February 2012. 
^ "Alaska Air Group Corporate Governance - Management". Alaska Air Group, Inc. Retrieved 21 February 2012. 
^ "Alaska Airlines Executive Leadership". Alaska Air Group, Inc. Retrieved 21 February 2012. 
^ http://www.bizjournals.com/seattle/blog/2015/12/the-2015-psbj-executive-of-the-year-has-led-his.html
^ http://blog.scoutingmagazine.org/2015/09/04/check-months-cover-alaska-airlines-magazine/#more-44996
^ a b "Chance class project inspires Tilden's airline career". Scene. PLU. Retrieved 21 February 2012. 
^ "Highline Schools Foundation gives out gold stars to five outstanding individuals". Highline Times. Retrieved 22 February 2012. 
^ Clements, Barbara. "Tilden Flies High as Alaska Airlines' new president". PLU. Retrieved 21 February 2012. 









v
t
e


Alaska Air Group



Certificated airlines



Alaska Airlines
Horizon Air
Virgin America





Heritage companies



Air Oregon
Alaska Coastal Airlines
Barnhill & McGee Airways
Jet America Airlines
McGee Airways
Star Air Service
Transwestern Airlines





Destinations



Alaska Airlines destinations
Horizon Air destinations
Virgin America destinations





Marketing brands



Alaska Horizon
Alaska SkyWest





Major incidents



Flight 261
Flight 779
Flight 1866





People



Bill Ayer
Bill Boyer Jr.
Bruce R. Kennedy
Linious "Mac" McGee
Brad Tilden





Namesakes



Alaska Airlines Arena
Alaska Airlines Center
Horizon Air Summer Series








List of airline holding companies










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Brad_Tilden&oldid=727000040"					
Categories: Alaska Air Group peopleAmerican airline chief executivesLiving peoplePeople from Issaquah, WashingtonAmerican chief financial officersEagle ScoutsPacific Lutheran University alumniUniversity of Washington alumniHidden categories: Articles with hCardsYear of birth missing (living people) 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 25 June 2016, at 23:07.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 






Data Dumps  |  Freebase API (Deprecated)
       |  Google Developers
    
    
      
        Freebase API (Deprecated)
      
    
    
    All Products
  
  Sign in

  
  Send feedback
  





            Hey there! Are you maybe looking for Firebase instead?

            







    Data Dumps
  


The Freebase API will be completely shut-down on Aug 31 2016. This page provides access to the last available data dump. Read more.
Data Dumps are a downloadable version of the data in Freebase. They constitute a snapshot of the data stored in Freebase and the Schema that structures it, and are provided under the same CC-BY license. The Freebase/Wikidata mappings are provided under the CC0 license.

Freebase Triples
Freebase Deleted Triples
Freebase/Wikidata Mappings
License
Citing

Freebase Triples


This dataset contains every fact currently in Freebase.

Total triples: 1.9 billion
Updated: Weekly
Data Format: N-Triples RDF
License: CC-BY

22 GB gzip250 GB uncompressed

Download



The RDF data is serialized using the N-Triples format, encoded as UTF-8 text and compressed with Gzip.


RDF
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.date> "2001-02"^^<http://www.w3.org/2001/XMLSchema#gYearMonth>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.source> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11x1gf2m6>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/type.object.type> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.rate> 4.5 .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://www.w3.org/1999/02/22-rdf-syntax-ns#type> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage>  .


If you're writing your own code to parse the RDF dumps its often more efficient to read directly from GZip file rather than extracting the data first and then processing the uncompressed data.
<subject>  <predicate>  <object> .
Note: In Freebase, objects have MIDs that look like /m/012rkqx. In RDF those MIDs become m.012rkqx. Likewise, Freebase schema like /common/topic are written as common.topic.
The subject is the ID of a Freebase object. It can be a Freebase MID (ex. m.012rkqx) for topics and CVTs or a human-readable ID (ex. common.topic) for schema.
The predicate is always a human-readable ID for a Freebase property or a property from a standard RDF vocabulary like RDFS. Freebase foreign key namespaces are also used as predicates to make it easier to look up keys by namespace.
The object field may contain a Freebase MID for an object or a human-readable ID for schema from Freebase or other RDF vocabularies. It may also include literal values like strings, booleans and numeric values.
Topic descriptions often contain newlines. In order to make each triple fit on one line, we have escaped newlines with "\n".
Freebase Deleted Triples
We also provide a dump of triples that have been deleted from Freebase over time. This is a one-time dump through March 2013. In the future, we might consider providing periodic updates of recently deleted triples, but at the moment we have no specific timeframe for doing so, and are only providing this one-time dump. 

The dump is distributed as a .tar.gz file (2.1Gb compressed, 7.7Gb uncompressed). It contains 63,036,271 deleted triples in 20 files (there is no particular meaning to the individual files, it is just easier to manipulate several smaller files than one huge file).


Thanks to Chun How Tan and John Giannandrea for making this data release possible.




Total triples: 63 million
Updated: June 9, 2013
Data Format: CSV
License: CC-BY

2 GB gzip8 GB uncompressed

Download



The data format is essentially CSV with one important caveat. The object field may contain any characters, including commas (as well as any other reasonable delimiters you could think of). However, all the other fields are guaranteed not to contain commas, so the data can still be parsed unambiguously.

The columns in the dataset are defined as:

creation_timestamp (Unix epoch time in milliseconds)
creator
deletion_timestamp (Unix epoch time in milliseconds)
deletor
subject (MID)
predicate (MID)
object (MID/Literal)
language_code



CSV
1352854086000,/user/mwcl_wikipedia_en,1352855856000,/user/mwcl_wikipedia_en,/m/03r90,/type/object/key,/wikipedia/en/$B816,en
1355171076000,/user/mwcl_musicbrainz,1364258198000,/user/turtlewax_bot,/m/0nncp9z,/music/recording/artist,/m/01vbfm4,en
1176630380000,/user/mwcl_images,1335928144000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/029w57m,/common/image/size,/m/0kly56,en
1292854917000,/user/mwcl_musicbrainz,1364823418001,/user/mbz_pipeline_merge_bot,/m/0fv1vl8,/type/object/type,/common/topic,en
1205530905000,/user/mwcl_images,1336022041000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/01x5scz,/common/licensed_object/license,/m/02x6b,en
1302391361000,/user/content_administrator,1336190973000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/0gkb45y,/type/object/type,/type/content,en
1176728962002,/user/mwcl_images,1335954186000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/08430h,/common/topic/image,/m/02cs147,en
1172002568007,/user/mwcl_chefmoz,1283588560000,/user/delete_bot,/m/01z4c1z,/type/object/name,La Casa Rosa Mexican Restaurant,en


Freebase/Wikidata Mappings


The data has been created based on the Wikidata-Dump of October 28, 2013, and contains only those links that have at least two common Wikipedia-Links and not a single disagreeing Wikipedia-Link. Furthermore, the lines are sorted by the number of common Wikipedia-Links (although in Turtle this does not really matter).

Total triples: 2.1M
Updated: October 28, 2013
Data Format: N-Triples RDF
License: CC0

21.2 MB gzip242.9 MB uncompressed

Download



The RDF data is serialized using the N-Triples format, encoded as UTF-8 text and compressed with Gzip.


RDF
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0695j>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q6718> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.05nrg>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs7>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q538> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0jgd>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q414> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0d_23>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q2537> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.04g7d>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q315> .


License
Freebase Data Dumps are provided free of charge for any purpose with regular updates by Google. They are distributed, like Freebase itself, under the Creative Commons Attribution (aka CC-BY) and use is subject to the Terms of Service.
The Freebase/Wikidata ID mappings are provided under CC0 and can be used without restrictions.
Citing
If you'd like to cite these data dumps in a publication, you may use:

Google, Freebase Data Dumps, https://developers.google.com/freebase/data, <month> <day>, <year>

Or as BibTeX:


BibTex

@misc{freebase:datadumps,
  title = "Freebase Data Dumps"
  author = "Google",
  howpublished = "\url{https://developers.google.com/freebase/data}",
  edition = "<month> <day>, <year>",
  year = "<year>"
}




Except as otherwise noted, the content of this page is licensed under the Creative Commons Attribution 3.0 License, and code samples are licensed under the Apache 2.0 License. For details, see our Site Policies. Java is a registered trademark of Oracle and/or its affiliates.

      
      Last updated February 10, 2017.
    




Send feedback about...
          
          This page
        
            
            Documentation feedback
          
        Freebase API (Deprecated)
        
            
            Product feedback
          
        
        Cancel
      
